     * Directory Global Directory

   Thomson Reuters
   (BUTTON) (BUTTON)

    1. Home
    2. Privacy statement

Thomson Reuters Privacy Statement

Available in other languages:

   中文（简体版）    中文（繁体版）   Nederlands    Français    Français(CA)
   Deutsch    Italiano    日本語    한국어    Português    Русский    Español
    Türk    عربي

   Effective May 25, 2018

   Your privacy and trust are important to us. This Statement explains how
   the Thomson Reuters group of companies (“Thomson Reuters,” “we”, “us”
   or “our”) collect, handle, store and protect personal information about
   you in the context of our services. It also provides information about
   your rights and about how you can contact us if you have questions
   about how we handle your information.
     * Who this statement applies to and what it covers
     * Who we are
     * Sources of personal information
     * What types of personal information we collect
     * How we use personal information
     * Legitimate interests for use
     * Marketing
     * How we share personal information
     * International transfers
     * How we secure personal information
     * How long we keep personal information
     * Your rights
     * Cookies and similar technologies
     * Where to find further privacy information on our products and
       services
     * How to contact us
     * Updates to this statement

Who this statement applies to and what it covers

   This Statement applies to individuals who use any website, application,
   including mobile application (“app”), product, software or service of
   ours that hyperlinks to this Statement (we call these our “Services”).

   It does not generally apply to individuals whose personal information
   forms part of the content included within our products, although you
   can find further information on that topic here.

   Thomson Reuters provides information solutions for professionals and
   our Services are generally not aimed at children.

   Depending on the Service, we may provide additional or different
   privacy statements or notices for specific interactions you have with
   us or to highlight how we use your personal information for specific
   Services. Where we do this, it will be clear which statements apply to
   which interactions and Services. For example, if you use one of our
   mobile apps, we provide you a separate notice in relation to a
   particular data type collected through that app.

   Within our Services, there may be links to third-party websites or
   applications. We are not responsible for the content or privacy
   compliance of third party websites or applications. You should check
   those websites or applications for their privacy statements and terms
   that apply to them.

   Children’s Privacy. Our Services are not generally aimed at children.
   In the limited circumstances where we may collect and use personal
   information about children, for example to develop an educational
   resource, we will comply with industry guidelines and applicable laws.

Who we are

   Thomson Reuters is a global company that is made up of numerous legal
   entities.

   For some Services we make decisions on how personal information is used
   in the context of a Service (Thomson Reuters is a controller of
   personal information in this case), and for other Services we will only
   use personal information as instructed by our customers (Thomson
   Reuters is a processor of personal information in this case). Below you
   can find more information on the cases in which Thomson Reuters is a
   controller of personal information and information on how to contact
   us.

   To learn more about the products in which we are a controller of
   personal information, please visit this site:
   https://www.thomsonreuters.com/content/dam/ewp-m/documents/thomsonreute
   rs/en/pdf/fact-sheets/thomson-reuters-as-a-controller-of-personal-infor
   mation-product-list.pdf. In the European Economic Area, if you wish to
   contact the Thomson Reuters entity that is controller for the Service
   relevant to you, please contact the following companies.  If you are
   unsure which entity to contact, or are located in another location, we
   welcome you to contact us for more information.
   Business Service
   Entity Contact
   Contact Address
   Legal
   Thomson Reuters (Professional) UK Limited
   Attention: Thomson Reuters Privacy Team, Legal Department, 30 South
   Colonnade-Canary Wharf, London E14 5EP, United Kingdom
   Tax & Accounting
   Thomson Reuters (Professional) UK Limited

   Further information about when we act as a processor of personal
   information and business specific details can be found here.

Sources of personal information

   We collect personal information about you from your interactions with
   us and from certain third parties and other sources (such as your
   employer or the subscriber providing access to our Services or from
   publicly available sources where permissible).

   We obtain personal information from you:
     * through your interactions with us and our Services, such as, when
       you purchase or use our Services, register for an event, request
       information or call us for support (please note that we may record
       or monitor our telephone calls for compliance and quality assurance
       purposes)
     * through your system/device and use of our Services. Our servers,
       logs and other technologies automatically collect system/device and
       usage information to help us administer, protect and improve our
       Services, analyze usage and improve users’ experience
     * through cookies and similar technologies included on our Services.
       More information relating to cookies, and how to control their use
       can be found here and information related to Interest-Based and
       Mobile Advertising can be found here.

   We also collect personal information about you from third parties such
   as:
     * the person(s) arranging for you to access our Services (e.g., your
       employer or our subscriber) in order to set up a user account
     * an organization to which you belong where that organization
       provides you access to our Services (such as a library providing
       you access to certain of our Services, like our legal information
       products)
     * partners and service providers who work with us in relation to your
       Service
     * publicly available sources such as public websites, open government
       databases or other data in the public domain, to help us maintain
       data accuracy and provide and enhance the Services

What types of personal information we collect

   The type of personal information we collect depends on how you are
   interacting with us and which Services you are purchasing or using.

   In many cases, you can choose whether or not to provide us with
   personal information, but if you choose not to, you may not get full
   functionality from the Services.

   The personal information we collect consists of the following:
     * Name and contact data, such as, first and last name, email address,
       postal address, phone number, and other similar contact data
     * Account Credentials, such as, passwords and other security
       information for authentication and access
     * User content, such as, communications and files provided by you in
       relation to your use of the Services
     * Payment information, such as, payment card number (credit or debit
       card), and the security code associated with your payment
       instrument, if you make a payment
     * Device information, such as, information about your device, such as
       IP address, location or provider
     * Usage information and browsing history, such as, information about
       how you navigate within our Services, your browsing history and
       which elements of our Services you use the most
     * Location data, for Services with location-enhanced features. If we
       need your consent to collect geo-location data, we will collect
       this separately
     * Demographic information, such as, your country, and preferred
       language
     * CCTV, if you visit us or attend a Thomson Reuters event

How we use personal information

   This section includes details of the purposes for which we use personal
   information and also the different legal grounds upon which we process
   that personal information. We use personal information to provide and
   improve Services and for other purposes that are in our legitimate
   interests, as well as for compliance purposes. Further information is
   set out below.

   Some laws require us to explain our lawful reason for processing your
   personal information. We process personal information about you on the
   basis that it is:
     * necessary for the performance of a contract: where we have a
       contract with you, we will process your personal information in
       order to fulfill that contract (i.e., to provide you with Services)
     * in our or a third parties’ legitimate interests: details of those
       legitimate interests are set out in more detail below (e.g.,
       provision of Services that we are contractually obliged by a third
       party, such as your employer or our subscriber, to deliver to you)
     * where you give us your consent: we only ask for your consent in
       relation to specific uses of personal information where we need to
       and, if we need it, we will collect it separately and make it clear
       that we are asking for consent
     * for compliance with a legal obligation (e.g., to respond to a court
       order or a regulator)

   You are welcome to contact us for further information on the legal
   grounds that we rely on in relation to any specific processing of your
   personal information.

Legitimate interests for use

   We use personal information for a number of legitimate interests,
   including to provide and improve Services, administer our relationship
   with you and our business, for marketing and in order to exercise our
   rights and responsibilities. More detailed information about these
   legitimate interests is set out below.
     * to set up and administer your account, provide technical and
       customer support and training, verify your identity, and send
       important account, subscription and Service information
     * to administer our relationship with you, our business and our
       third-party providers (e.g., to send invoices)
     * to deliver and suggest tailored content such as news, research,
       reports and business information. We analyze the way you use our
       Services to make suggestions to you for features or Services that
       we believe you will also be interested in, and so that we can make
       our Services more user-friendly
     * to personalize your experience with our Services. We may retain
       your browsing and usage information to make your searches within
       our Services more relevant and use those insights to target
       advertising to you online on our websites and apps. Your choices in
       relation to marketing are explained here.
       We may sometimes share your personal information across our
       Services so that we can make all of the Services we deliver to you
       more intuitive (e.g., rather than requiring you to enter the same
       data many times)
     * to contact you in relation to, and conduct, surveys or polls you
       choose to take part in and to analyze the data collected for market
       research purposes
     * to display information you choose to post, share, upload or make
       available in chat rooms, messaging services, and community and
       event forums (including in community and event profiles) and for
       related collaboration, peer connection, games and information
       exchange
     * to provide any third party, who has made our Services available to
       you (e.g., your employer or our subscriber), insights about use of
       the Services
     * for internal research and development purposes and to improve, test
       and enhance the features and functions of our Services
     * to provide you with marketing as permitted by law
     * to meet our internal and external audit requirements, including our
       information security obligations (and if your employer or our
       subscriber provides for your access to our Services, to meet their
       internal and external audit requirements)
     * to enforce our terms and conditions
     * to protect our rights, privacy, safety, networks, systems and
       property, or those of other persons
     * for the prevention, detection or investigation of a crime or other
       breach of law or requirement, loss prevention or fraud
     *  to comply with requests from courts, law enforcement agencies,
       regulatory agencies, and other public and government authorities,
       including where they are outside your country of residence
     * in order to exercise our rights, and to defend ourselves from
       claims and to comply with laws and regulations that apply to us or
       third parties with whom we work
     * in order to participate in, or be the subject of, any sale, merger,
       acquisition, restructure, joint venture, assignment, transfer or
       other disposition of all or any portion of our business, assets or
       stock (including in connection with any bankruptcy or similar
       proceedings)

   Where we rely on legitimate interests as a lawful ground for processing
   your personal information, we balance those interests against your
   interests, fundamental rights and freedoms. For more information on how
   this balancing exercise has been carried out, please contact our
   Privacy Team.

Marketing

   We deliver marketing and event communications to you across various
   platforms such as email, telephone, text messaging, direct mail and
   online. Where required by law, we will ask you to explicitly opt in to
   receive marketing from us. If we send you a marketing communication it
   will include instructions on how to opt out of receiving these
   communications in the future.

   Honoring your marketing preferences is important to us. You have the
   right to opt out of receiving direct marketing and targeted online
   advertising.

   How to Opt Out of Email Marketing

   Where we send marketing emails, we provide unsubscribe options for your
   use within our emails. To update your email marketing preferences,
   please visit the applicable email preference center, a link to which
   will normally be included in emails you receive from us. In addition,
   you can also use the “Contact Us” feature of a particular Service,
   discuss with your Thomson Reuters contact or contact our Privacy Team.

   Even if you opt out of receiving marketing communications by email, we
   may still send you service communications or important transactional
   information related to your accounts and subscriptions (for purposes
   such as providing customer support).

   Interest-based advertising (IBA)

   Interest-based advertising (IBA) allows us to deliver targeted
   advertising to users of our Services. IBA works by showing you
   advertisements, or sending you marketing emails, that are based on the
   type of content you access or read. For example, as you browse our
   Services, one of the cookies placed on your device will be an
   advertising cookie so we can better understand what sort of pages or
   content you are interested in. The information collected about your
   device enables us to group you with other devices that have shown
   similar interests. We can then display advertising to categories of
   users that is based on common interests. For more information about
   IBA, please visit:
   http://www.iab.net/public_policy/behavioral-advertisingprinciples.

   Opting out of IBA

   If you want to opt out of receiving interest-based advertising, it does
   not mean that you will no longer receive advertising when you are using
   our Services. It just means that we will not use your personal
   information for IBA and that any advertising you see will not be
   customized to you. You can exercise your online advertising choices at
   http://optout.aboutads.info or by clicking the AdChoices icon in an ad
   and following the instructions.  You may also opt out of receiving
   interest-based ads from many sites through the Network Advertising
   Initiative's (NAI) Opt Out Tool
   (http://www.networkadvertising.org/choices) and in the EU at
   http://www.youronlinechoices.com/. If you delete cookies, use a
   different device, or change web browsers, you may need to opt out
   again.

   Advertising on mobile devices

   Mobile devices have an identifier that gives companies the ability to
   serve targeted ads to a specific mobile device. In many cases, you can
   turn off mobile device ad tracking or you can reset the advertising
   identifier at any time within your mobile device privacy settings.
   Another tool you can use to control advertising on your mobile device
   is the AppChoices App: http://youradchoices.com/appchoices. You may
   also choose to turn off location tracking on your mobile device. If you
   turn off ad tracking or location tracking, we will no longer use
   information collected from your device’s advertising identifier for the
   purposes of advertising. You may still see the same number of ads but
   they may be less relevant because they will not be based on your
   interests.  Where we need your consent to gather information about your
   location we will obtain this from you.

How we share personal information

   We share personal information within the Thomson Reuters group, with
   our business partners and third party service providers, the person
   providing for your access to our Services (if that is not you) and in
   accordance with law. Our third-party service providers are not
   permitted to share or use personal information we make available to
   them for any purpose other than to provide services to us.

   We share your information for the purposes set out in this Statement,
   with the following categories of recipients:
     * Thomson Reuters group companies
     * the person providing your access to our Services (e.g., your
       employer or our subscriber)
     * business partners with whom we deliver co-branded Services, provide
       content, or to host events, conferences and seminars
     * third parties that help us deliver Services or act on our behalf
     * third parties where we have a duty to or are permitted to disclose
       your personal information by law (e.g., government agencies, law
       enforcement, courts and other public authorities)
     * third parties in order to participate in, or be the subject of, any
       sale, merger, acquisition, restructure, joint venture, assignment,
       transfer or other disposition of all or any portion of our
       business, assets or stock (including in connection with any
       bankruptcy or similar proceedings), in which case we may disclose
       your personal data to prospective buyers, sellers, advisers or
       partners and your data may be a transferred asset in a business
       sale
     * third parties where reasonably required to protect our rights,
       users, systems and Services (e.g., legal counsel and information
       security professionals)
     * any person you have asked us to share information with (e.g., if
       you upload information into a public forum it is shared publicly)

International transfers

   Thomson Reuters is a global organization and your personal information
   may be stored and processed outside of your home country, including in
   countries that may not offer the same level of protection for your
   personal information as your home country. We have measures in place to
   ensure that when your personal information is transferred
   internationally, it is subject to appropriate safeguards in accordance
   with data protection laws. Often, these include contractual safeguards.
   More information about these safeguards (including copies, where
   relevant) can be obtained by contacting us here.

   Thomson Reuters has networks, databases, servers, systems, support and
   helpdesks around the world.  We collaborate with third parties like
   cloud hosting services, suppliers and technology support located around
   the world to serve the needs of our business, workforce and customers.
   We take appropriate steps to ensure that personal information is
   processed, secured and transferred according to applicable law. In some
   cases, we may need to disclose or transfer your personal information
   within Thomson Reuters or to third parties in areas outside of your
   home country, including to countries that have not been declared
   adequate for the purposes of data protection by the  European
   Commission.

   The areas in which these recipients are located will vary from time to
   time, but include the United States, Europe, Canada, Asia (including
   Australia and India), and other countries where Thomson Reuters has a
   presence or uses contractors.  Click to see a list of global locations
   at https://www.thomsonreuters.com/en/locations.html.

   When we transfer personal information internationally, we put in place
   safeguards in accordance with applicable law (including Articles 44 to
   50 of the EU General Data Protection Regulation).  If you would like to
   know more about our data transfer practices and obtain copies of any
   relevant safeguarding measures, please contact our Privacy Team.

How we secure personal information

   Thomson Reuters takes the security of personal information seriously
   and we use appropriate technologies and procedures to protect personal
   information (including administrative, technical and physical
   safeguards) according to the risk level and the service provided.

   We have in place a global Information Security and Risk Management
   team, led by our Chief Information Security Officer, which is
   responsible for implementing secure data handling practices at Thomson
   Reuters.

   Our information security policies and procedures are closely aligned
   with widely accepted international standards and are reviewed regularly
   and updated as necessary to meet the sensitivity of the personal
   information we handle, our business needs, changes in technology and
   regulatory requirements. We have implemented appropriate information
   security controls.

   More information on the steps we have taken to ensure our information
   security practices meet the requirements of the EU General Data
   Protection Regulation can be accessed here:
   https://www.thomsonreuters.com/content/dam/ewp-m/documents/thomsonreute
   rs/en/pdf/faqs/thomson-reuters-and-the-gdpr.pdf.

How long we keep personal information

   We retain your information in accordance with our enterprise records
   retention schedule. You can find more information on the criteria used
   to calculate the retention periods set out below.

   Thomson Reuters has a Records and Information Governance team that
   works in conjunction with our Privacy Team to implement policies and
   rules relating to the retention of personal information. We have an
   enterprise records retention schedule that is based upon a
   classification scheme consisting of business functions, record classes,
   and record types.

   We calculate retention periods for your personal information in
   accordance with the following criteria:
     * the length of time necessary to fulfill the purposes we collected
       it for
     * when you or your employer (or other subscriber providing for your
       access to our Services) cease to use our Services
     * the length of time it is reasonable to keep records to demonstrate
       that we have fulfilled our duties and obligations
     * any limitation periods within which claims might be made
     * any retention periods prescribed by law or recommended by
       regulators, professional bodies or associations
     * the existence of any relevant proceedings

Your rights

   You may have rights under European and other laws to have access to
   your personal information and to ask us to rectify, erase and restrict
   use of, your personal information. You may also have rights to object
   to your personal information being used, to ask for the transfer of
   personal information you have made available to us and to withdraw
   consent to the use of your personal information. Further information on
   how to exercise your rights is set out below.

   We will honor your rights under applicable data protection laws. You
   have the following rights under European laws, and may have similar
   rights under the laws of other countries.
     * Right of subject access: The right to make a written request for
       details of your personal information and a copy of that personal
       information
     * Right to rectification: The right to have inaccurate information
       about you corrected or removed
     * Right to erasure ('right to be forgotten'): The right to have
       certain personal information about you erased
     * Right to restriction of processing: The right to request that your
       personal information is only used for restricted purposes
     * Right to opt out of marketing: You can manage your marketing
       preferences by unsubscribe links found in the communications you
       receive from us or by visiting the applicable preference center
     * Right to object: The right to object to processing of your personal
       information in cases where our processing is based on the
       performance of a task carried out in the public interest or we have
       let you know the processing is necessary for our or a third party’s
       legitimate interests
     * Right to data portability: The right to ask for the personal
       information you have made available to us to be transferred to you
       or a third party in machine-readable format
     * Right to withdraw consent: The right to withdraw any consent you
       have previously given us to handle your personal information. If
       you withdraw your consent, this will not affect the lawfulness of
       our use of your personal information prior to the withdrawal of
       your consent

   These rights are not absolute and they do not always apply in all
   cases.

   In response to a request, we will ask you to verify your identity if we
   need to, and to provide information that helps us to understand your
   request better. If we do not comply with your request, whether in whole
   or in part, we will explain why.

   In order to exercise your rights please visit the following site:
   http://thomsonreutersdsr.ethicspoint.com.

   Legal Business Public Records Products: For requests related to
   PeopleMap, Public Records on Westlaw and CLEAR, please visit the
   following site:
   https://legalsolutions.thomsonreuters.com/law-products/about/legal-noti
   ces/privacy/records?CID=TRSite.

Cookies and similar technologies

   Thomson Reuters and our third-party providers set and use cookies and
   similar technologies to store and manage user preferences, deliver
   targeted advertising, enable content, and gather analytic and usage
   data, for example. The use of cookies and other tracking technologies
   is standard across websites and apps through which information is
   collected about your online activities across applications, websites,
   or other services. More information about how we use cookies and
   similar technologies and how you can control and manage them is below.

   What is a cookie?

   A cookie is a small text file that is placed on a computer or other
   device and is used to identify the user or device and to collect
   information. Cookies are typically assigned to one of four categories,
   depending on their function and intended purpose: absolutely necessary
   cookies, performance cookies, functional cookies, and cookies for
   marketing purposes.

   Types of cookies and why we use them

   Absolutely necessary cookies: These cookies are essential to enable you
   to move around a website and use its features. Without these cookies,
   Services you have asked for, like adding items to an online shopping
   cart, cannot be provided.

   Performance cookies: These cookies collect information about how you
   use our websites. Information collected includes, for example, the
   Internet browsers and operating systems used, the domain name of the
   website previously visited, the number of visits, average duration of
   visit, and pages viewed. These cookies only collect information in an
   aggregated format. Performance cookies are used to improve the
   user-friendliness of a website and enhance your experience.

   Functionality cookies: These cookies allow the website to remember
   choices you make (such as your username or ID, language preference, or
   the area or region you are in) and provide enhanced, more personal
   features. These cookies can also be used to remember changes you have
   made to text size, fonts, and other customizable parts of web pages.
   They may also be used to provide Services you have asked for, such as
   watching a video or commenting on a blog. These cookies cannot track
   your browsing activity on other websites.

   Targeting and advertising cookies: These cookies track browsing habits
   and are used to deliver targeted (interest-based) advertising. They are
   also used to limit the number of times you see an ad and to measure the
   effectiveness of advertising campaigns. They remember that you have
   visited a website and this information is shared with other
   organizations, such as advertisers.

   Managing cookies

   You can manage website cookies in your browser settings, and you always
   have the choice to change these settings by accepting, rejecting, or
   deleting cookies. If you choose to change your settings, you may find
   that certain functions and features will not work as intended on the
   Services. All browser settings are slightly different, so to manage
   cookies, you should refer to the relevant settings within your browser.

   We understand that you may want to know more about cookies. Here are
   some useful resources that provide detailed information about types of
   cookies, how they are used, and how you can manage your cookie
   preferences: www.aboutcookies.org  or www.allaboutcookies.org. Please
   click below for detailed information on how to disable and delete
   cookies in some commonly used browsers:
     * Mozilla Firefox®
     * Microsoft® Internet Explorer
     * Google Chrome™
     * Safari®

   We use certain other tracking technologies in addition to cookies:
     * Local shared objects/Flash cookies: Flash cookies, also known as
       local shared objects, are designed to support browser content
       supported by Adobe® Flash. They are usually used to enable ads and
       video content on websites. Like other cookies, they will store
       information on your device, some of which will be specific to the
       Flash-enabled content. Flash cookies can only be deleted within
       Adobe Flash rather than via your browser. Please refer to the
       following help page for information on how to manage your privacy
       settings and deletion of Flash cookies:
       http://www.macromedia.com/support/documentation/en/flashplayer/help
       /settings_manager.html.
     * Web beacons: Our web pages may contain electronic images known as
       web beacons (also called single-pixel gifs and transparent graphic
       images) that we use to help deliver cookies on our sites, count
       users who have visited those sites, deliver Services, and analyze
       the effectiveness of our promotional campaigns, for example. We may
       also include web beacons in our marketing email messages or
       newsletters to determine whether an email is opened or if links are
       clicked. Web beacons are also used to deliver you interest-based
       advertising.
     * Web server & application logs: Our servers automatically collect
       certain information to help us administer and protect the Services,
       analyze usage, and improve users’ experience. The information
       collected includes:
          + IP address and browser type
          + Device information including Unique Device Identifier (UDID),
            MAC address, Identifier For Advertisers (IFA), and similar
            identifiers we or others may assign
          + Device operating system and other technical facts
          + The city, state, and country from which you access our website
          + Pages visited and content viewed, stored, and purchased
          + Information or text entered
          + Links and buttons clicked
          + URLs visited before and after you use our Services

   “Do Not Track” Signals

   Some browsers transmit Do Not Track (DNT) signals to websites. Due to
   the lack of a common interpretation of DNT signals throughout the
   industry, we do not currently alter, change, or respond to DNT requests
   or signals from these browsers. We continue to monitor industry
   activity in this area and reassess our DNT practices as necessary.

   Connecting via social networks

   Some of our Services may include social networking features, such as
   the Facebook® “Like” button and widgets, “Share” buttons, and
   interactive mini-programs. Additionally, you may choose to use your own
   social networking logins from, for example, Facebook or LinkedIn®, to
   log into some of our Services. If you choose to connect using a social
   networking or similar service, we may receive and store authentication
   information from that service to enable you to log in and other
   information that you may choose to share when you connect with these
   Services. These Services may collect information such as the web pages
   you visited and IP addresses, and may set cookies to enable features to
   function properly. We are not responsible for the security or privacy
   of any information collected by these third parties. You should review
   the privacy statements or policies applicable to the third-party
   services you connect to, use, or access. If you do not want your
   personal information shared with your social media account provider or
   other users of the social media service, please do not connect your
   social media account with your account for the Services and do not
   participate in social sharing on the Services.

Where to find further privacy information on our products and services

   This Statement generally relates to the personal information we collect
   about users in connection with the Services, where we make decisions
   about how that personal information is handled (Thomson Reuters as a
   controller). However, you can click on “Learn More” below for more
   information about how we process personal information that our
   customers input into our Services and for which Thomson Reuters does
   not make decisions about (Thomson Reuters as a processor).

   Where we need to give you additional information about how your
   personal information is used in relation to specific Services we will
   provide separate or additional privacy notices.

   Your professional service provider (e.g., your financial, tax, legal or
   accounting adviser) and other third parties may enter your personal
   information into Services we make available to, and host for them on
   their behalf. They may provide their own privacy notices to you. You
   should contact them for these notices, and you may also be able to find
   their privacy notices on their websites.

   Use of Publicly Available Data within Our Services

   Many professionals and third parties rely on the use of publicly
   available information in order to carry out research (e.g., on case
   law) or to satisfy their compliance obligations (e.g., to carry out
   anti-money-laundering checks).

   To assist them, we make available information obtained from publicly
   available sources like public websites, open government databases or
   other data in the public domain (some of which is behind a paywall and
   some not).

   We take privacy seriously and put in place measures designed to ensure
   that we process personal information in a proportionate way and in
   compliance with data protection laws.

   Where we process non-sensitive personal information within those
   Services, it is normally processed because it is in our or a third
   parties’ legitimate interests to do so. In the limited circumstances
   where we process sensitive personal information, we normally do so
   where:
     * necessary in relation to obligations under employment, social
       security and social protection law
     * personal information has been manifestly made public by the person
       to whom it relates
     * necessary for the establishment, exercise or defence of legal
       claims or whenever courts are acting in their judicial capacity
     * processing is necessary for reasons of substantial public interest,
       on the basis of applicable law

   We put in place appropriate measures to protect your information where
   it is transferred internationally, to secure it and to ensure it is
   retained only for a reasonable period.

   If you would like to make further enquiries about how personal
   information is used within a specific Service, please contact our
   Privacy Team.

   To provide you with additional context on other products and services
   we offer, we have provided below more information regarding certain
   data protection practices in our Legal and Tax & Accounting businesses.

   Legal Products and Services

   Our global Legal business provides research and business management and
   efficiency tools to the legal profession, often processing personal
   information that our users input into the Services. For example, if a
   law firm uses our firm management Services, they may record personal
   information when using those Services and they may ask us to hold or
   access it on their behalf (e.g., to provide software/Service support).

   Thomson Records Legal public records products include the CLEAR suite
   of products and public records data on Westlaw, including PeopleMap and
   Company Investigator. These products are made up of consumer and
   company data aggregated from government agencies and reputable third
   party private data providers. These products are available only to
   authorized businesses and government organizations for their legitimate
   internal business uses and subject to applicable law. In addition to
   this Statement, these products are also subject to the Public Records
   Privacy Statement, available
   here: https://legalsolutions.thomsonreuters.com/law-products/about/lega
   l-notices/privacy/records?CID=TRSite.

   For more information about how your legal professionals handle your
   personal information, please contact them directly.

   Thomson Reuters recognizes and respects that many of its customers and
   users of our Legal business Services (such as Westlaw and Practical
   Law) may be subject to ethical obligations to protect confidences with
   their clients. Where we act as a service provider in regard to the
   personal or confidential information that our customers or users input
   into our Legal Services, we do so in accordance with permissible law
   and we do not use any such information other than to provide,
   administer and improve our Services, provide user support or to meet
   our legal obligations.

   Tax & Accounting Products and Services

   Our global Tax & Accounting business provides tools that support tax
   and accounting professionals. These Services typically process personal
   information on behalf of our customers when they use our Services.
   This may include sensitive personal information such as information
   that could determine a person’s race, ethnicity, sexual orientation
   and/or health status. For example, if an accountant uses our  tax and
   accounting software, they may use it to process information about
   individuals and they may ask us to hold or access that information on
   their behalf (e.g., when providing software/Service support).

   If you would like to find out more about the personal information held
   by your accountant or tax professional, please contact them directly.

How to contact us

   If you have any questions, comments, complaints or suggestions in
   relation to data protection or this Statement, or any other concerns
   about the way in which we process information about you, please contact
   our Privacy Team at privacy.enquiries@tr.com or at Privacy Team,
   Thomson Reuters, 30 South Colonnade-Canary Wharf, London E14 5EP,
   United Kingdom.

   If you are not satisfied with the response, we encourage you to
   escalate your query to our Data Protection Officer at
   dpprivacyofficer@tr.com or at Data Protection Officer, Thomson Reuters,
   30 South Colonnade-Canary Wharf, London E14 5EP, United Kingdom.

   Additionally, if you wish to locate a Thomson Reuters office, please
   see https://www.thomsonreuters.com/en/locations.html.

   Filing a Complaint. If you are not content with how Thomson Reuters
   manages your personal information, you can lodge a complaint with a
   privacy supervisory authority. In the European Economic Area, the
   relevant supervisory authority is the one in the country or territory
   where:
     * you are resident
     * you work, or
     * the alleged infringement took place

   A list of National Data Protection Authorities in the European Economic
   Area can be found here:
   http://ec.europa.eu/justice/data-protection/bodies/authorities/index_en
   .htm.

Updates to this statement

   This Statement may be subject to updates. Any material future changes
   or additions to the processing of personal information as described in
   this Statement affecting you will be communicated to you through an
   appropriate channel. For example, we may place a prominent notice on a
   product site or email you to let you know of an updated Statement.
   Thomson Reuters
   (BUTTON)

   IFRAME: https://www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-KGLP7Z9
     * Directory Global directory

     * Logins Product logins
     * Support Support & training
     * Contact Contact us

   Close (BUTTON)

Our Privacy Statement & Cookie Policy

   All Thomson Reuters websites use cookies to improve your online
   experience. They were placed on your computer when you launched this
   website. You can change your cookie settings through your browser.
     * Privacy Statement
     * Cookie Policy

   (BUTTON) Ok to continue
   Thomson Reuters
   (BUTTON) (BUTTON)
     * Solutions
       (BUTTON)
       Solutions

Industries
          + Legal Leverage unparalleled legal content, expertise, and
            technology
          + News & media Find essential resources for broadcasters and
            publishers
          + Tax & accounting Explore our tax and accounting technology,
            guidance, and expertise

Organizations
          + Corporations Let us help you solve your toughest business
            challenges
          + Government Government professionals trust us to help them make
            informed decisions
          + Professional services firms Access global tax, legal, and risk
            management resources for today’s professional services firms
     * Insights
       (BUTTON)
       Insights

Topics
          + Artificial intelligence
          + Big data
          + Blockchain
          + Brexit
          + Data privacy & GDPR
          + Global trade
          + Regulatory intelligence
          + See all articles

Reports
          + AI predictions
          + Are you ready for blockchain?
          + Ending modern slavery
          + Will electric vehicles really create a cleaner planet?
          + See all reports
     * About us
       (BUTTON)
       About us

Our company
          + Overview
          + Company history
          + Awards & recognition
          + Events
          + Partners
          + Office locations

Media
          + Investor relations
          + Media contacts
          + Press releases

Leadership
          + Board of directors
          + Executive team

Our values
          + Social impact
          + Thomson Reuters Foundation
          + Trust Principles
     * Careers
       (BUTTON)
       Careers

Thomson Reuters Careers
          + Careers overview
          + Connect with us
          + FAQs
          + Sign up for job alerts
          + Careers blog

Who we are
          + Working at Thomson Reuters
          + Our people
          + Our story app

Where we are
          + Our office locations

Our jobs
          + Experienced professionals
          + Sales
          + Technology
          + Temporary jobs in the US
          + Temporary jobs in the UK
          + See all jobs

Graduates & interns
          + Recent graduates
          + Internships

    1. Home
    2. Policies
    3. Copyright notice

Copyright notice

   © 2019 Thomson Reuters. All rights reserved. Republication or
   redistribution of Thomson Reuters content, including by framing or
   similar means, is prohibited without the prior written consent of
   Thomson Reuters. Thomson Reuters and the Kinesis logo are trademarks of
   Thomson Reuters and its affiliated companies.

Rights and permissions, reprints and products

   Follow these links for information on seeking permission to use Thomson
   Reuters materials, as well as purchasing reprints, images and products:
     * Request rights and permissions for Legal Solutions products.
     * Request Reuters text reprints.
     * Request Reuters pictures and Reuters graphics.
     * Request Reuters video.
     * Request Reuters products and gifts.
     * Request rights and permissions for Tax & Accounting’s PPC® and
       Quickfinder® content.
     * Request rights and permissions for all other Tax and Accounting
       content (permission will not be granted for any web republication
       requests).
     * Logo request? Visit the Trade Mark Center.
     * Other General Rights and Permissions requests.

Copyright Infringement Concerns

   If you believe that your work has been copied or otherwise made
   available on a Thomson Reuters product or service in a manner that
   constitutes copyright infringement, you may notify us by contacting us
   by email or by contacting our designated agent listed below. Please
   include sufficient information for us to identify the material
   involved.

   If your query is not infringement related click here for Rights and
   Permissions, Reprints and Products.

   Thomson Reuters Copyright Agent
   Thomson Reuters
   3 Times Square
   New York, NY 10036

   Tel: +1 646-223-4354
   Fax: +1 646-223-4356

   Email (for copyright infringement concerns only)

United States Digital Millennium Copyright Act Information

   Notification Process

   If you are contacting us about material included on a Thomson Reuters
   product or service at the direction of someone outside of Thomson
   Reuters, please include the information noted below in your
   notification. Please consult your legal counsel or review the U.S
   Digital Millennium Copyright Act see 17 U.S.C. Section 512 to confirm
   these requirements:
     * Your physical or electronic signature.
     * Identification of the copyrighted work claimed to have been
       infringed.
     * Information which will help us locate the material on our product
       or service.
     * Your complete contact information, including your name, address,
       telephone number, and email address.
     * A statement that you have a good faith belief that use of the
       material in the manner complained of is not authorized by the
       copyright owner, its agent, or the law.
     * A statement that the information in the notification is accurate,
       and under penalty of perjury, that you are authorized to act as the
       owner or on behalf of the owner of an exclusive right that is
       allegedly infringed.#
     * If your notification does not substantially comply with this
       format, we may be unable to properly analyze and respond.
     * Please remember that knowing misrepresentation that the material or
       activity is infringing, or that it was removed in error may be
       liable for damages.

   Counter-Notification Process

   If you receive a notice that material you posted to a Thomson Reuters
   product or services is being blocked or removed due to a copyright
   infringement allegation, you may send us a counter notice explaining
   why you believe the blocking or removal is in error. Again, please
   consult your legal counsel or review the U.S Digital Millennium
   Copyright Act see 17 U.S.C. Section 512 to confirm these requirements.

   To be effective, such notice must be in writing and include the
   following:
     * Your physical or electronic signature.
     * Identification of the copyrighted work blocked or removed.
       Information which will help us locate where the material had
       appeared on our product or service.
     * Your complete contact information, including your name, address,
       telephone number, and email address.
     * A statement that you have a good faith belief that removal or
       blocking of the material was the result of a mistake or
       misidentification.
     * A statement that you consent to the jurisdiction of Federal
       District Court for the judicial district in which your address is
       located, or if you are outside the United States, the judicial
       district in which we are located, and that you will accept service
       of process from the person who contacted us regarding the alleged
       infringement person, or his or her agent.

   Please send your notice to the Thomson Reuters Copyright Agent at the
   above mentioned address.
   Search
   ____________________
   (BUTTON)
   (BUTTON)

     * (BUTTON) About Thomson Reuters
          + About us
          + Annual report
          + Careers
          + Events
          + Investor relations
          + Press releases
          + Site map
     * (BUTTON) Products & Services
          + All products
          + Corporations
          + Government
          + Legal
          + News & media
          + Professional services firms
          + Tax & accounting
     * (BUTTON) Learn More
          + Innovation @ Thomson Reuters
          + Insights from Answers On
          + Partnerships
          + Social impact
          + Supplier portal
     * (BUTTON) Contacts
          + Contact us
          + Global sites directory
          + Investors
          + Media relations
          + Office locations
          + Sales & account inquiries
     * (BUTTON) Connect With Us
          + Facebook
          + Instagram
          + LinkedIn
          + Twitter
          + YouTube

   Thomson Reuters
   (BUTTON)
     * Cookie policy
     * Terms of use
     * Privacy statement
     * Copyright
     * Careers
     * Supply chain transparency

   IFRAME: https://www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-KGLP7Z9
     * Directory Global directory

     * Logins Product logins
     * Support Support & training
     * Contact Contact us

   Close (BUTTON)

Our Privacy Statement & Cookie Policy

   All Thomson Reuters websites use cookies to improve your online
   experience. They were placed on your computer when you launched this
   website. You can change your cookie settings through your browser.
     * Privacy Statement
     * Cookie Policy

   (BUTTON) Ok to continue
   Thomson Reuters
   (BUTTON) (BUTTON)
     * Solutions
       (BUTTON)
       Solutions

Industries
          + Legal Leverage unparalleled legal content, expertise, and
            technology
          + News & media Find essential resources for broadcasters and
            publishers
          + Tax & accounting Explore our tax and accounting technology,
            guidance, and expertise

Organizations
          + Corporations Let us help you solve your toughest business
            challenges
          + Government Government professionals trust us to help them make
            informed decisions
          + Professional services firms Access global tax, legal, and risk
            management resources for today’s professional services firms
     * Insights
       (BUTTON)
       Insights

Topics
          + Artificial intelligence
          + Big data
          + Blockchain
          + Brexit
          + Data privacy & GDPR
          + Global trade
          + Regulatory intelligence
          + See all articles

Reports
          + AI predictions
          + Are you ready for blockchain?
          + Ending modern slavery
          + Will electric vehicles really create a cleaner planet?
          + See all reports
     * About us
       (BUTTON)
       About us

Our company
          + Overview
          + Company history
          + Awards & recognition
          + Events
          + Partners
          + Office locations

Media
          + Investor relations
          + Media contacts
          + Press releases

Leadership
          + Board of directors
          + Executive team

Our values
          + Social impact
          + Thomson Reuters Foundation
          + Trust Principles
     * Careers
       (BUTTON)
       Careers

Thomson Reuters Careers
          + Careers overview
          + Connect with us
          + FAQs
          + Sign up for job alerts
          + Careers blog

Who we are
          + Working at Thomson Reuters
          + Our people
          + Our story app

Where we are
          + Our office locations

Our jobs
          + Experienced professionals
          + Sales
          + Technology
          + Temporary jobs in the US
          + Temporary jobs in the UK
          + See all jobs

Graduates & interns
          + Recent graduates
          + Internships

    1. Home
    2. About Us
    3. The Trust Principles

The Trust Principles

   Thomson Reuters is dedicated to upholding the Trust Principles and to
   preserving its independence, integrity, and freedom from bias in the
   gathering and dissemination of information and news.
   Visit the Thomson Reuters Trustees page

Trust Principles – the history

   The Trust Principles were created in 1941, in the midst of World War
   II, in agreement with The Newspaper Proprietors Association Limited and
   The Press Association Limited (being the Reuters shareholders at that
   time). The Trust Principles imposed obligations on Reuters and its
   employees to act at all times with integrity, independence, and freedom
   from bias.

   Reuters Directors and shareholders were determined to protect and
   preserve the Trust Principles established in 1941 when Reuters became a
   publicly traded company on the London Stock Exchange and Nasdaq. A
   unique structure was put in place to achieve this. A new company was
   formed and given the name 'Reuters Founders Share Company Limited', its
   purpose being to hold a 'Founders Share' in Reuters.

   The legal structure has evolved over time and the Founders Share and
   other contractual arrangements now confer a number of special rights
   upon the Thomson Reuters Founders Share Company. For example, (i) the
   Thomson Reuters Founders Share Company has enhanced voting rights in
   circumstances where someone is seeking to obtain a significant
   shareholding in, or acquire control of, Thomson Reuters and (ii) the
   prior consent of the Thomson Reuters Founders Share Company must be
   sought prior to undertaking any sale of, or other material transaction
   involving, the Reuters news business unit.

   Thomson Reuters itself is obliged and committed to apply the Trust
   Principles to its operations. The charter documents of Thomson Reuters
   Corporation include provisions to safeguard the Trust Principles as
   they apply to the Thomson Reuters business and require Thomson Reuters
   Directors, in the performance of their duties, to have due regard to
   the Trust Principles, by the proper exercise of their powers and in
   accordance with their other duties as Directors.

The Trust Principles are:

    1. That Reuters shall at no time pass into the hands of any one
       interest, group, or faction;
    2. That the integrity, independence, and freedom from bias of Thomson
       Reuters shall at all times be fully preserved;
    3. That Reuters shall supply unbiased and reliable news services to
       newspapers, news agencies, broadcasters, and other media
       subscribers and to businesses, governments, institutions,
       individuals, and others with whom Reuters has or may have
       contracts;
    4. That Thomson Reuters shall pay due regard to the many interests
       which it serves in addition to those of the media; and
    5. That no effort shall be spared to expand, develop, and adapt the
       news and other services and products of Thomson Reuters so as to
       maintain its leading position in the international news and
       information business

   Thomson Reuters Founders Share Company was established in 1984 when
   Reuters became a public company. The directors of Thomson Reuters
   Founders Share Company (known as ‘Trustees’) have a duty to ensure, to
   the extent possible, that the Trust Principles are complied with.

   The Trustees are experienced and eminent people from diverse arenas in
   politics, diplomacy, media, public service, and business. The Trustees
   are selected by a nomination committee and proposed to the board of
   Thomson Reuters Founders Share Company for appointment. The nomination
   committee also has unique features. Two of its members are judges from
   the European Court of Human Rights and assist in scrutinizing
   candidates' suitability. The Thomson Reuters board has two
   representatives on the nomination committee. The Chairman and the
   Deputy Chairman of the Thomson Reuters Founders Share Company Board are
   members of the nomination committee and the Chairman, who also chairs
   the nomination committee, appoints three other Trustees to the
   nomination committee.. The other members are representatives of the
   press associations from the UK, Australia, and New Zealand.

   The number of Trustees has to be at least 14 and not more than 18.
   Trustees have a minimum of two meetings per year, and receive reports
   on our activities in the different fields in which we operate
   (including Reuters news). The Trustees meet with both the Thomson
   Reuters Board and representatives of senior management. Through Thomson
   Reuters Founders Share Company's Chairman, regular contact is
   maintained with our company. The relationship is one of trust and
   confidence.

Independence of Thomson Reuters

   Customers across the world depend on us to provide them with reliable
   and objective news and information.

   This means that we have a special need to safeguard our independence
   and integrity and avoid any bias which may stem from control by
   specific individuals or interests.

   The Thomson Reuters Trust Principles were adopted in 1941 and include
   the preservation of integrity, reliability of news, development of the
   news business, and related principles.

   Today, the Trust Principles are fundamental to our entire business.

More information

     * Trustee directors and Trust Principles

Contact us

   Brian Moss

   For inquiries pertaining to Reuters reporting standards and the Trust
   Principles please email: brian.moss@thomsonreuters.com.
   Search
   ____________________
   (BUTTON)
   (BUTTON)

     * (BUTTON) About Thomson Reuters
          + About us
          + Annual report
          + Careers
          + Events
          + Investor relations
          + Press releases
          + Site map
     * (BUTTON) Products & Services
          + All products
          + Corporations
          + Government
          + Legal
          + News & media
          + Professional services firms
          + Tax & accounting
     * (BUTTON) Learn More
          + Innovation @ Thomson Reuters
          + Insights from Answers On
          + Partnerships
          + Social impact
          + Supplier portal
     * (BUTTON) Contacts
          + Contact us
          + Global sites directory
          + Investors
          + Media relations
          + Office locations
          + Sales & account inquiries
     * (BUTTON) Connect With Us
          + Facebook
          + Instagram
          + LinkedIn
          + Twitter
          + YouTube

   Thomson Reuters
   (BUTTON)
     * Cookie policy
     * Terms of use
     * Privacy statement
     * Copyright
     * Careers
     * Supply chain transparency

   IFRAME: https://www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-KGLP7Z9
     * Global directory Global directory

   (BUTTON) (BUTTON)

    1. French
    2. Déclaration de confidentialité

Thomson Reuters Déclaration de confidentialité

Disponible dans d'autres langues:

   中文（简体版）    中文（繁体版）   Nederlands    English    Français(CA)
   Deutsch    Italiano    日本語    한국어    Português    Русский    Español
    Türk    عربي

   Date d'entrée en vigueur : 25 mai 2018

   Votre vie privée et votre confiance sont importantes pour nous. La
   présente Déclaration explique comment le groupe de sociétés de Thomson
   Reuters (ci-après dénommé « Thomson Reuters », « nous », « notre » ou
   « nos ») recueille, traite, stocke et protège vos informations
   personnelles dans le cadre de nos services. Elle fournit également des
   informations sur vos droits et sur la façon dont vous pouvez nous
   contacter si vous avez des questions au sujet de la manière dont nous
   traitons vos informations.
     * À QUI S'APPLIQUE CETTE DÉCLARATION ET QUE COUVRE-T-ELLE ?
     * QUI SOMMES-NOUS ?
     * SOURCES D'INFORMATIONS PERSONNELLES
     * QUELS TYPES D'INFORMATIONS RECUEILLONS-NOUS ?
     * COMMENT UTILISONS-NOUS LES INFORMATIONS PERSONNELLES ?
     * INTÉRÊTS LÉGITIMES DE L'UTILISATION
     * MARKETING
     * COMMENT PARTAGEONS-NOUS LES INFORMATIONS PERSONNELLES ?
     * TRANSFERTS INTERNATIONAUX
     * COMMENT GARANTISSONS-NOUS LA SÉCURITÉ DES INFORMATIONS PERSONNELLES
       ?
     * QUELLE EST LA DURÉE DE CONSERVATION DES INFORMATIONS PERSONNELLES ?
     * VOS DROITS
     * COOKIES ET TECHNOLOGIES APPARENTÉES
     * OU TROUVER DE PLUS AMPLES INFORMATIONS SUR LA PROTECTION DES
       INFORMATIONS PERSONNELLES SUR NOS PRODUITS ET NOS SERVICES ?
     * COMMENT NOUS CONTACTER ?
     * MISES À JOUR DE CETTE DÉCLARATION

À QUI S'APPLIQUE CETTE DÉCLARATION ET QUE COUVRE-T-ELLE ?

   La présente Déclaration s'applique aux personnes qui utilisent tout
   site Web, application, y compris application mobile (ci-après dénommée
   « application »), produit, logiciel ou service nous appartenant et
   renvoyant vers la présente Déclaration (ci-après dénommés nos
   « Services »).

   En principe, elle ne s'applique pas aux personnes dont les informations
   personnelles font partie du contenu disponible dans nos produits. De
   plus amples informations à ce sujet sont disponibles ici.

   Thomson Reuters propose des solutions pour professionnels ; nos
   services ne sont généralement pas destinés à des enfants.

   Selon le Service, nous pouvons fournir des déclarations de
   confidentialité supplémentaires ou différentes ou des avis pour des
   interactions spécifiques que vous avez avec nous, ou pour mettre en
   évidence la façon dont nous utilisons vos informations personnelles
   pour des Services spécifiques. Dans ce cas, nous indiquerons clairement
   quelle déclaration s'applique à quels Services et interactions. Par
   exemple, si vous utilisez l'une de nos applications mobiles, nous vous
   fournissons un avis distinct lié à un type particulier d'informations
   recueillies grâce à cette application.

   Nos Services peuvent comprendre des liens vers les sites Web et
   applications de tiers. Nous ne sommes pas responsables du contenu ou du
   respect de la confidentialité des sites Web ou applications de tiers.
   Nous vous recommandons de consulter les déclarations de confidentialité
   et conditions générales de ces sites Web et applications.

   Confidentialité des enfants. Nos Services ne sont généralement pas
   destinés aux enfants. Dans l'éventualité où nous serions amenés à
   recueillir et à utiliser les informations personnelles d'un enfant, par
   exemple pour développer des ressources pédagogiques, nous nous
   conformerions aux directives du secteur et aux lois en vigueur.

QUI SOMMES-NOUS ?

   Thomson Reuters est une société mondiale constituée de nombreuses
   entités juridiques.

   Pour certains Services, nous prenons des décisions sur la façon dont
   les informations personnelles sont utilisées dans le contexte d'un
   Service (dans ce cas, Thomson Reuters est un responsable des
   informations personnelles). Pour d'autres Services, nous utiliserons
   les informations personnelles uniquement de la manière indiquée par nos
   clients (dans ce cas, Thomson Reuters est un sous-traitant des
   informations personnelles). Des détails sur les cas dans lesquels
   Thomson Reuters est un responsable des informations personnelles, ainsi
   que des informations sur la manière de nous contacter, sont disponibles
   ci-dessous.

   Pour en savoir plus sur les produits pour lesquels nous sommes un
   responsable des informations personnelles, rendez-vous sur ce site :
   https://www.thomsonreuters.com/content/dam/ewp-m/documents/thomsonreute
   rs/en/pdf/fact-sheets/thomson-reuters-as-a-controller-of-personal-infor
   mation-product-list.pdf. Dans l'Espace économique européen, si vous
   désirez contacter l'entité Thomson Reuters responsable d'un Service
   particulier, veuillez vous adresser aux entreprises suivantes.  Si vous
   n'êtes pas sûr de savoir quelle entité contacter, ou si vous vous
   trouvez dans un lieu différent, nous vous invitons à nous contacter
   pour plus d'informations.
   Service
   Coordonnées de l'entité
   Adresse de contact
   Service Juridique
   Thomson Reuters (Professional) UK Limited
   À l'attention de : Équipe de protection de la vie privée Thomson
   Reuters, Service juridique, 30 South Colonnade-Canary Wharf, Londres,
   E14 5EP, Royaume-Uni
   Tax & Accounting
   Thomson Reuters (Professional) UK Limited

   De plus amples informations sur les cas pour lesquels nous agissons
   comme sous-traitant des informations personnelles, ainsi que des
   détails spécifiques aux entreprises, sont disponibles ici.

SOURCES D'INFORMATIONS PERSONNELLES

   Nous recueillons vos informations personnelles lorsque vous
   interagissez avec nous et avec certains tiers, et par le biais d'autres
   sources (telles que votre employeur ou l'abonné fournissant l'accès à
   nos Services, ou des sources accessibles au public lorsque cela est
   permis).

   Nous obtenons des informations personnelles auprès de vous :
     * lorsque vous interagissez avec nous et nos Services, par exemple,
       quand vous achetez ou utilisez nos Services, vous vous inscrivez à
       un événement, demandez des renseignements ou nous appelez pour
       obtenir de l'aide (veuillez noter que nous pouvons enregistrer ou
       surveiller nos appels téléphoniques à des fins d'assurance qualité
       et de conformité) ;
     * par le biais de votre système/appareil et lorsque vous utilisez nos
       Services. Nos serveurs, nos fichiers journaux et autres
       technologies recueillent automatiquement certaines informations
       relatives à votre système/appareil et à votre utilisation pour nous
       aider à gérer, à protéger et à améliorer nos Services, analyser
       l'utilisation et améliorer l'expérience utilisateur ;
     * par le biais de cookies et d'autres technologies similaires inclus
       dans nos Services. Des informations supplémentaires sur les cookies
       et sur le contrôle de leur utilisation sont disponibles ici et des
       renseignements relatifs à la publicité mobile et la publicité
       ciblée par centre d'intérêt ici.

   Nous recueillons également des informations personnelles vous
   concernant auprès de tiers tels que :
     * la ou les personnes qui vous permettent d'accéder à nos Services
       (par exemple, votre employeur ou notre abonné) afin de configurer
       un compte d'utilisateur ;
     * une organisation à laquelle vous appartenez, où cette organisation
       vous donne accès à nos Services (par exemple, une bibliothèque vous
       donnant accès à certains de nos Services, comme nos produits
       d'informations juridiques) ;
     * les partenaires et fournisseurs de services qui travaillent avec
       nous dans le cadre de votre Service ;
     * des sources accessibles au public telles que des sites Web publics,
       des bases de données gouvernementales ouvertes ou d'autres données
       dans le domaine public, pour nous aider à maintenir l'exactitude
       des données et à fournir et à améliorer les Services.

QUELS TYPES D'INFORMATIONS RECUEILLONS-NOUS ?

   Le type d'informations personnelles que nous recueillons dépend de la
   façon dont vous interagissez avec nous et des Services que vous achetez
   ou utilisez.

   Dans de nombreux cas, vous pouvez choisir ou non de nous fournir des
   informations personnelles, mais si vous choisissez de ne pas le faire,
   vous risquez de ne pas obtenir la fonctionnalité complète des Services.

   Les informations personnelles que nous recueillons se composent des
   éléments suivants :
     * le nom et les données de contact, comme le nom et le prénom,
       l'adresse e-mail, l'adresse postale, le numéro de téléphone et
       d'autres données de contact similaires ;
     * les identifiants de compte, comme les mots de passe et d'autres
       informations de sécurité utilisées pour l'authentification et
       l'accès ;
     * le contenu de l'utilisateur, comme les communications et fichiers
       que vous fournissez en lien avec votre utilisation des Services ;
     * les informations de paiement, comme le numéro de carte de paiement
       (carte de crédit ou de débit) et le code de sécurité associé à
       votre moyen de paiement, si vous effectuez un paiement ;
     * les informations sur l'appareil d'accès, comme les informations sur
       votre appareil [pour accéder nos services] telles que l'adresse IP,
       l'emplacement et le fournisseur ;
     * des informations sur l'utilisation et l'historique de navigation,
       comme les informations sur la façon dont vous naviguez au sein de
       nos Services, votre historique de navigation et quels éléments de
       nos Services que vous utilisez le plus ;
     * les données d'emplacement, pour des Services comportant des
       fonctionnalités d'emplacement améliorées. Si nous avons besoin de
       votre consentement pour recueillir les données de géolocalisation,
       nous recueillerons celles-ci séparément ;
     * des informations démographiques, comme votre pays et votre langue
       préférée ;
     * des données de vidéosurveillance, si vous nous rendez visite ou
       assistez à un événement Thomson Reuters.

COMMENT UTILISONS-NOUS LES INFORMATIONS PERSONNELLES ?

   Cette section inclut les détails des fins pour lesquelles nous
   utilisons les informations personnelles, ainsi que les différents
   motifs juridiques selon lesquels nous traitons vos informations
   personnelles. Nous utilisons les informations personnelles pour fournir
   et améliorer les Services, à d'autres fins qui sont dans nos intérêts
   légitimes, ainsi qu'à des fins de conformité. De plus amples
   informations sont présentées ci-dessous.

   Certaines lois exigent que nous expliquions notre raison légitime de
   traiter vos informations personnelles. Nous traitons vos informations
   personnelles en nous fondant sur les principes suivants :
     * cela est nécessaire pour l'exécution d'un contrat : si nous sommes
       liés par un contrat, nous traiterons vos informations personnelles
       pour remplir ce contrat (c'est-à-dire, pour vous fournir des
       Services) ;
     * cela rentre dans le cadre de nos intérêts légitimes ou dans ceux
       d'un tiers : ces intérêts légitimes sont exposés plus en détail
       ci-dessous (par exemple, prestation de Services que nous sommes
       contractuellement tenus de vous fournir par un tiers, tel que votre
       employeur ou notre abonné) ;
     * lorsque vous nous donnez votre consentement : nous demandons votre
       consentement uniquement pour certaines utilisations spécifiques de
       vos informations personnelles pour lesquelles nous en avons besoin,
       si nous en avons besoin, nous recueillerons ces informations
       séparément et préciserons clairement que nous demandons votre
       consentement ;
     * pour respecter une obligation légale (par exemple, pour répondre à
       une ordonnance du tribunal ou à un organisme de réglementation).

   Nous vous invitons à nous contacter pour obtenir de plus amples
   informations sur les motifs juridiques sur lesquels nous basons le
   traitement spécifique de vos informations personnelles.

INTÉRÊTS LÉGITIMES DE L'UTILISATION

   Nous utilisons les informations personnelles pour un certain nombre
   d'intérêts légitimes, y compris pour fournir et améliorer les Services,
   gérer notre relation avec vous et nos activités, pour des besoins
   marketing et pour exercer nos droits et responsabilités. Des
   informations plus détaillées sur ces intérêts légitimes sont présentées
   ci-dessous :
     * pour configurer et gérer votre compte, fournir une assistance
       technique et clientèle et des formations, vérifier votre identité
       et envoyer des informations importantes concernant les comptes,
       abonnements et Services ;
     * pour gérer notre relation avec vous, nos activités et nos
       fournisseurs tiers (par exemple, pour envoyer des factures) ;
     * pour fournir et suggérer des contenus personnalisés tels que des
       actualités, recherches, rapports et informations commerciales. Nous
       analysons la façon dont vous utilisez nos Services pour vous
       suggérer des fonctionnalités ou Services qui pourraient vous
       intéresser et pour rendre nos Services plus conviviaux ;
     * pour personnaliser votre expérience de nos Services. Nous pouvons
       conserver vos informations de navigation et d'utilisation pour
       rendre vos recherches au sein de nos Services plus pertinentes.
       Nous pouvons aussi les utiliser pour vous proposer des publicités
       ciblées en ligne sur nos sites Web et applications. Vos choix en
       matière de marketing sont expliqués ici. Nous devons parfois
       partager vos informations personnelles avec nos différents Services
       pour rendre ces derniers plus intuitifs (par exemple, pour éviter
       de vous obliger à saisir les mêmes données plusieurs fois) ;
     * pour vous contacter au sujet de sondages ou enquêtes auxquels vous
       choisissez de participer, pour mener lesdits sondages et enquêtes
       et pour analyser les données recueillies à des fins d'études de
       marché ;
     *  pour afficher les informations que vous choisissez de publier, de
       partager, de télécharger ou de rendre disponibles dans les salles
       de conversation, les services de messagerie et les forums
       d'événements ou de la communauté (y compris dans les profils de
       communauté et d'événements) et pour des collaborations connexes,
       connexion entre pairs, jeux et échanges d'informations ;
     * pour fournir à tout tiers qui met nos Services à votre disposition
       (par exemple, votre employeur ou notre abonné) des informations sur
       l'utilisation des Services ;
     * à des fins de recherche et développement en interne et pour
       améliorer, tester et perfectionner les fonctionnalités et fonctions
       de nos Services ;
     * pour vous fournir du contenu marketing conformément aux lois en
       vigueur ;
     * pour répondre à nos exigences en matière d'audit interne et
       externe, y compris nos obligations de sécurité des informations (et
       si votre employeur ou notre abonné vous fournit l'accès à nos
       Services, afin de répondre à leurs exigences en matière d'audit
       interne et externe) ;
     * pour faire appliquer nos conditions générales ;
     * pour protéger nos droits, nos vies privées, notre sécurité, nos
       réseaux, nos systèmes et nos biens, ou ceux d'autres personnes ;
     * pour prévenir, détecter ou enquêter sur un crime ou une autre
       violation de loi ou d'obligation, et pour prévenir des pertes ou
       une fraude ;
     * pour nous conformer aux demandes des tribunaux, des autorités
       chargées de faire respecter la loi, des organismes de
       réglementation et d'autres autorités publiques et gouvernementales,
       y compris lorsqu'ils sont situés en dehors de votre pays de
       résidence ;
     * afin d'exercer nos droits, pour nous défendre contre des
       réclamations et pour nous conformer aux lois et règlements auxquels
       nous, ou les tiers avec lesquels nous travaillons, sommes soumis ;
     * lorsque nous sommes impliqués dans, ou soumis à une fusion, une
       vente, une restructuration, une acquisition, une coentreprise, une
       cession, un transfert ou toute autre disposition de tout ou partie
       de nos activités, de nos actifs ou de nos actions (y compris dans
       le cadre d'une faillite ou d'une procédure similaire).

   Lorsque nous utilisons nos intérêts légitimes comme motif juridique
   pour le traitement de vos informations personnelles, nous équilibrons
   ces intérêts avec vos intérêts et vos droits et libertés fondamentaux.
   Pour plus d'informations sur la façon dont cet exercice d'équilibrage a
   été effectué, veuillez contacter notre équipe de protection de la vie
   privée.

MARKETING

   Nous vous envoyons des communications sur le marketing et les divers
   événements à travers plusieurs plateformes, telles que les e-mails, le
   téléphone, les SMS et le publipostage direct et en ligne. Lorsque la
   loi l'exige, nous vous demanderons de vous abonner explicitement pour
   recevoir nos communications marketing. Si nous vous envoyons une
   communication marketing, celle-ci comprendra des instructions sur la
   manière de vous désabonner pour ne plus recevoir ce type de
   communications à l'avenir.

   Nous mettons un point d'honneur à honorer vos préférences en matière de
   marketing. Vous avez le droit de refuser de recevoir des communications
   de marketing direct et des publicités ciblées en ligne.

   Comment se désabonner des e-mails marketing ?

   Lorsque nous envoyons des e-mails marketing, ceux-ci contiennent des
   options de désabonnement à votre intention. Pour mettre à jour vos
   préférences en matière d'e-mails marketing, rendez-vous dans le centre
   de préférences de courrier électronique concerné ; un lien vers
   celui-ci est normalement inclus dans les e-mails que nous vous
   envoyons. Vous pouvez également utiliser la fonction « Contactez-nous »
   d'un Service particulier, discuter avec votre responsable Thomson
   Reuters ou contacter notre équipe de protection de la vie privée.

   Même si vous décidez de ne plus recevoir de communications marketing
   par e-mail, nous pouvons toujours vous envoyer des communications ou
   informations transactionnelles importantes concernant vos comptes et
   abonnements (notamment à des fins d'assistance clientèle).

   Publicité ciblée par centre d'intérêt

   La publicité ciblée par centre d'intérêt nous permet de fournir des
   publicités ciblées aux utilisateurs de nos services. Ce processus
   fonctionne en vous affichant les publicités ou en vous envoyant des
   e-mails marketing basés sur le type de contenu que vous lisez ou auquel
   vous accédez. Par exemple, lorsque vous consultez nos Services, l'un
   des cookies placés sur votre périphérique sera un cookie publicitaire
   qui nous permettra de mieux comprendre quel type de page ou de contenu
   vous intéresse. Les informations recueillies sur votre périphérique
   nous aident à vous regrouper avec d'autres périphériques qui ont
   signalé des intérêts similaires. Nous sommes alors en mesure d'afficher
   des publicités destinées à des catégories d'utilisateurs en nous basant
   sur leurs intérêts communs. Pour obtenir davantage d'informations à ce
   sujet, veuillez
   consulter : http://www.iab.net/public_policy/behavioral-advertisingprin
   ciples.

   Refus de la publicité ciblée par centre d'intérêt

   Si vous souhaitez vous désabonner des publicités ciblées par centre
   d'intérêt, cela ne signifie pas que vous ne pourrez plus recevoir de
   publicité lorsque vous utilisez nos Services. Cela signifie simplement
   que nous n'utiliserons pas vos informations personnelles pour afficher
   des publicités selon vos intérêts et que toutes les publicités que vous
   verrez ne seront pas personnalisées ou pertinentes pour vous. Vous
   pouvez exercer vos choix concernant la publicité en ligne à
   l'adresse http://optout.aboutads.info ou en cliquant sur l'icône
   AdChoices dans une annonce publicitaire et en suivant les
   instructions.  Vous pouvez également vous désabonner des publicités
   ciblées par centre d'intérêt provenant de nombreux sites grâce à
   l'option Opt Out Tool de la Network Advertising Initiative (NAI)
   (http://www.networkadvertising.org/choices) et dans l'Union européenne
   à l'adresse http://www.youronlinechoices.com/. Pour rappel, si vous
   supprimez les cookies, utilisez un autre périphérique ou changez de
   navigateur Internet, vous devrez peut-être vous désabonner de nouveau.

   Publicité sur les appareils mobiles

   Les appareils mobiles présentent un identificateur qui donne aux
   entreprises la capacité de proposer des annonces publicitaires ciblées
   sur un appareil mobile spécifique. Dans de nombreux cas, vous pouvez
   désactiver l'appareil mobile pour le suivi des annonces publicitaires
   ou réinitialiser l'identificateur publicitaire à tout moment dans les
   paramètres de confidentialité de votre appareil mobile. Vous pouvez
   également contrôler la publicité sur votre appareil mobile grâce à
   l'application AppChoices : http://youradchoices.com/appchoices. Vous
   pouvez également choisir de désactiver la géolocalisation sur votre
   appareil mobile. Si vous désactivez le suivi des annonces publicitaires
   ou la géolocalisation, nous ne pourrons plus utiliser les informations
   recueillies à partir de l'identificateur publicitaire de votre appareil
   à des fins de publicité. Vous pouvez toujours voir le même nombre
   d'annonces publicitaires, mais elles seront moins pertinentes
   puisqu'elles ne seront pas basées sur vos intérêts.  Lorsque nous
   aurons besoin de votre consentement pour recueillir des informations
   sur votre emplacement, nous vous le demanderons.

COMMENT PARTAGEONS-NOUS LES INFORMATIONS PERSONNELLES ?

   Nous partageons les informations personnelles au sein du groupe Thomson
   Reuters, avec nos partenaires commerciaux et fournisseurs de services
   tiers, avec la personne vous fournissant l'accès à nos Services (si ce
   n'est pas vous) et conformément à la loi. Nos fournisseurs de services
   tiers ne sont pas autorisés à partager ou à utiliser les informations
   personnelles que nous mettons à leur disposition pour toute finalité
   autre que la fourniture de services que nous avons demandés.

   Nous partageons vos informations aux fins établies dans la présente
   Déclaration, avec les catégories suivantes de bénéficiaires :
     * les sociétés du groupe Thomson Reuters ;
     * la personne vous fournissant l'accès à nos Services (par exemple,
       votre employeur ou notre abonné) ;
     * les partenaires commerciaux avec lesquels nous fournissons des
       Services comarqués, proposons du contenu ou organisons des
       événements, des conférences et des séminaires ;
     * les tiers qui nous aident à offrir des Services ou qui agissent en
       notre nom ;
     * les tiers auxquels nous avons l'obligation ou autorisation légale
       de divulguer vos informations personnelles (par exemple, des
       organismes gouvernementaux, les autorités chargées de faire
       respecter la loi, les tribunaux et d'autres autorités publiques) ;
     * des tiers lorsque nous sommes impliqués dans, ou soumis à une
       fusion, une vente, une restructuration, une acquisition, une
       coentreprise, une cession, un transfert ou toute autre disposition
       de tout ou partie de nos activités, de nos actifs ou de nos actions
       (y compris dans le cadre d'une faillite ou d'une procédure
       similaire), auquel cas nous pourrons divulguer vos données
       personnelles à des acheteurs potentiels, des vendeurs, des
       conseillers ou des partenaires et vos données pourront constituer
       un actif transféré lors d'une vente d'entreprise ;
     * des tiers lorsque cela est raisonnablement nécessaire pour protéger
       nos droits, utilisateurs, systèmes et Services (par exemple, les
       conseillers juridiques et les spécialistes en sécurité de
       l'information) ;
     * toute personne avec laquelle vous nous avez demandé de partager des
       informations (par exemple, si vous téléchargez des informations
       vers un forum public, celles-ci sont partagées publiquement).

TRANSFERTS INTERNATIONAUX

   Thomson Reuters est une organisation mondiale et vos informations
   personnelles peuvent être stockées et traitées en dehors de votre pays
   d'origine, y compris dans des pays qui n'offrent pas nécessairement le
   même niveau de protection de vos informations personnelles que votre
   pays d'origine. Nous avons mis en place des mesures pour nous assurer
   que lorsque vos informations personnelles sont transférées à
   l'étranger, elles soient soumises à des garanties suffisantes
   conformément aux lois relatives à la protection des données. Il s'agit
   souvent de garanties contractuelles. Pour obtenir plus d'informations
   sur ces garanties (y compris les copies, le cas échéant),
   contactez-nous ici.

   Thomson Reuters dispose de réseaux, de bases de données, de serveurs,
   de systèmes et de bureaux d'assistance partout dans le monde.  Nous
   collaborons avec des tiers tels que des services d'hébergement sur le
   cloud, des fournisseurs et des personnes en charge de l'assistance
   technologique à travers le monde pour répondre aux besoins de notre
   entreprise, de nos collaborateurs et de nos clients. Nous prenons les
   mesures appropriées pour nous assurer que les informations personnelles
   sont traitées, sécurisées et transférées en vertu de la législation en
   vigueur. Dans certains cas, nous pouvons avoir besoin de divulguer ou
   de transférer vos informations personnelles au sein de Thomson Reuters
   ou à des tiers dans des régions à l'extérieur de votre pays d'origine,
   y compris vers des pays qui n'ont pas été déclarés adéquats aux fins de
   la protection des données par la Commission européenne.

   Les régions dans lesquelles les destinataires sont situées varieront de
   temps à autre, mais elles incluent les États-Unis, l'Europe, le Canada,
   l'Asie (y compris l'Australie et l'Inde) et d'autres pays où Thomson
   Reuters est présent ou a recours à des sous-traitants.  Cliquez ici
   pour voir une liste d'emplacements mondiaux :
   https://www.thomsonreuters.com/en/locations.html.

   Lorsque nous transférons des informations personnelles en dehors des
   frontières, nous mettons en place des garanties conformément aux lois
   en vigueur (y compris les articles 44 à 50 du Règlement général sur la
   protection des données de l'UE).  Si vous souhaitez en savoir plus sur
   nos pratiques de transfert de données et obtenir des copies de toutes
   les garanties, veuillez contacter notre équipe de protection de la vie
   privée.

COMMENT GARANTISSONS-NOUS LA SÉCURITÉ DES INFORMATIONS PERSONNELLES ?

   Thomson Reuters prend la sécurité des informations personnelles très au
   sérieux et nous utilisons des technologies et procédures appropriées
   pour les protéger (y compris des garanties administratives, techniques
   et physiques) en fonction du niveau de risque et du service fourni.

   Nous disposons d'une équipe mondiale de sécurité de l'information et de
   gestion des risques, dirigée par notre responsable principal de la
   sécurité des informations, qui est responsable de la mise en œuvre de
   pratiques de gestion sécurisée des données chez Thomson Reuters.

   Nos politiques et nos procédures de sécurité des informations sont
   étroitement alignées sur les normes internationales généralement
   acceptées. Elles sont en outre régulièrement examinées et mises à jour
   si nécessaire afin de répondre à la sensibilité des informations
   personnelles que nous traitons, aux besoins de l'entreprise, aux
   changements technologiques et aux exigences réglementaires. Nous avons
   mis en œuvre des contrôles de sécurité de l'information appropriés.

   Des informations supplémentaires sur les mesures que nous avons prises
   pour nous assurer que nos pratiques de sécurité de l'information
   répondent aux exigences du Règlement général sur la protection des
   données de l'Union européenne sont disponibles ici :
   https://www.thomsonreuters.com/content/dam/ewp-m/documents/thomsonreute
   rs/en/pdf/faqs/thomson-reuters-and-the-gdpr.pdf.

QUELLE EST LA DURÉE DE CONSERVATION DES INFORMATIONS PERSONNELLES ?

   Nous conservons vos informations personnelles conformément à notre
   programme de conservation des dossiers de l'entreprise. Vous trouverez
   davantage d'informations sur les critères utilisés pour calculer les
   périodes de conservation ci-dessous.

   Thomson Reuters dispose d'une équipe de gouvernance des dossiers et des
   informations qui travaille en collaboration avec l'équipe de protection
   de la vie privée pour mettre en œuvre des politiques et des règles
   relatives à la conservation des informations personnelles. Notre
   programme de conservation des dossiers de l'entreprise est basé sur un
   système de classification composé de fonctions commerciales, de
   catégories de dossiers et de types de dossiers.

   Nous calculons les périodes de conservation de vos informations
   personnelles en fonction des critères suivants :
     * le délai nécessaire pour remplir les objectifs pour lesquels nous
       les avons recueillies ;
     * lorsque vous ou votre employeur (ou un autre abonné vous
       fournissant l'accès à nos Services) cessez d'utiliser nos
       Services ;
     * le délai raisonnable pendant lequel nous pouvons conserver des
       dossiers pour prouver que nous avons rempli nos devoirs et
       obligations ;
     * tout délai de prescription durant lequel des réclamations
       pourraient être faites ;
     * toute période de conservation prévue par la loi ou recommandée par
       les autorités de régulation, des organismes professionnels ou des
       associations ;
     * l'existence de toute procédure pertinente.

VOS DROITS

   En vertu des lois européennes et autres, vous pouvez avoir le droit
   d'accéder à vos informations personnelles et de nous demander de les
   rectifier, de les supprimer et de restreindre leur l'utilisation. Vous
   pouvez aussi avoir le droit d'interdire l'utilisation de vos
   informations personnelles, de demander le transfert d'informations
   personnelles que vous avez mises à notre disposition et de retirer
   votre consentement concernant l'utilisation de ces informations. De
   plus amples informations sur la façon d'exercer vos droits sont
   présentées ci-dessous.

   Nous respecterons vos droits en vertu des lois en vigueur relatives à
   la protection des données. Vous disposez des droits suivants en vertu
   des lois européennes et les lois d'autres pays peuvent vous conférer
   des droits similaires.
     * Droit d'accès pour la personne concernée : le droit de faire une
       demande écrite pour obtenir des détails sur vos informations
       personnelles et une copie de ces informations.
     * Droit de rectification : le droit de faire corriger ou supprimer
       des informations erronées.
     * Droit de suppression (« droit d'être oublié ») : le droit de faire
       supprimer certaines de vos informations personnelles.
     * Droit de restriction de traitement : le droit de demander à ce que
       vos informations personnelles soient utilisées uniquement à des
       fins limitées.
     * Droit de refuser les communications marketing : vous pouvez gérer
       vos préférences marketing grâces aux liens fournis dans les
       communications que nous vous envoyons ou en consultant le centre de
       préférences concerné.
     * Droit d'opposition : le droit de vous opposer au traitement de vos
       informations personnelles dans les cas où notre traitement est basé
       sur l'exécution d'une mission effectuée dans l'intérêt public ou
       lorsque nous vous avons informé que le traitement est nécessaire
       pour servir nos intérêts légitimes ou ceux d'un tiers.
     * Droit à la portabilité des données : le droit de demander à ce que
       les informations personnelles que vous avez mises à notre
       disposition soient transférées, à vous ou à un tiers, dans un
       format lisible par une machine.
     * Droit de retrait du consentement : le droit de retirer tout
       consentement que vous nous avez donné pour traiter vos informations
       personnelles. Si vous retirez votre consentement, cela n'affectera
       pas la légalité de notre utilisation de vos informations
       personnelles précédant le retrait de votre consentement.

   Ces droits ne sont pas absolus et ne s'appliquent pas dans tous les cas
   de figure.

   En réponse à une demande, nous vous demanderons de vérifier votre
   identité si nous devons le faire et de nous fournir des informations
   qui nous aideront à mieux comprendre votre demande. Si nous ne nous
   conformons pas à votre demande, en totalité ou en partie, nous vous
   expliquerons pourquoi.

   Pour exercer vos droits, veuillez consulter le site suivant :
   http://thomsonreutersdsr.ethicspoint.com.

   Produits juridiques professionnels pour les dossiers publics : pour les
   demandes liées à PeopleMap, aux dossiers publics sur Westlaw et à
   CLEAR, veuillez consulter le site suivant :
   https://legalsolutions.thomsonreuters.com/law-products/about/legal-noti
   ces/privacy/records?CID=TRSite.

COOKIES ET TECHNOLOGIES APPARENTÉES

   Thomson Reuters et nos fournisseurs tiers configurent et utilisent des
   cookies et des technologies apparentées pour stocker et gérer les
   préférences de l'utilisateur, fournir des publicités ciblées, activer
   le contenu et recueillir des données d'utilisation et d'analyse, entre
   autres. L'utilisation des cookies et d'autres technologies de suivi est
   une pratique standard sur les sites Web et dans les applications, par
   l'intermédiaire de laquelle sont recueillies des informations sur vos
   activités en ligne sur les applications, les sites Web ou d'autres
   services. Des informations supplémentaires sur la manière dont nous
   utilisons les cookies et les technologies apparentées et comment vous
   pouvez les contrôler et les gérer sont présentées ci-dessous.

   Qu'est-ce qu'un cookie ?

   Un cookie est un petit fichier texte qui est placé sur un ordinateur ou
   un autre périphérique, et qui est utilisé pour identifier l'utilisateur
   ou l'appareil et pour recueillir des informations. Les cookies sont
   généralement attribués à une catégorie parmi les quatre existantes,
   selon leur fonction et leur but : les cookies strictement nécessaires,
   les cookies de performance, les cookies de fonctionnalité et les
   cookies marketing.

   Types de cookies et pourquoi nous les utilisons

   Cookies strictement nécessaires : ces cookies sont essentiels pour vous
   permettre de naviguer sur un site Web et pour utiliser ses
   fonctionnalités. Sans ces cookies, les Services que vous avez demandés,
   comme l'ajout d'articles dans un panier en ligne, ne peuvent pas être
   fournis.

   Cookies de performance : ces cookies recueillent des informations sur
   la manière dont vous utilisez nos sites Web. Les informations
   recueillies comprennent, par exemple, les navigateurs et les systèmes
   d'exploitation utilisés, le nom de domaine du site Web précédemment
   visité, le nombre de visites, la durée moyenne de visite et les pages
   consultées. Ces cookies recueillent uniquement des informations
   globales. Les cookies de performance sont utilisés pour améliorer la
   convivialité d'un site Web et pour améliorer l'expérience de
   l'utilisateur.

   Cookies de fonctionnalité : ces cookies permettent au site Web de se
   souvenir de vos choix (comme votre nom d'utilisateur ou votre ID, votre
   langue préférée ou la zone ou région dans laquelle vous vous trouvez)
   et de vous proposer des fonctionnalités améliorées et plus
   personnalisées. Ces cookies peuvent également être utilisés pour
   mémoriser les modifications que vous avez apportées à la taille du
   texte, aux polices et à d'autres parties personnalisables des pages
   Internet. Ils peuvent aussi être utilisés pour fournir des Services que
   vous avez demandés, comme visionner une vidéo ou publier des
   commentaires sur un blog. Ces cookies ne peuvent pas suivre vos
   activités de navigation sur d'autres sites Web.

   Cookies de ciblage et publicitaires : ces cookies suivent les habitudes
   de navigation et sont utilisés pour proposer des publicités ciblées par
   centre d'intérêt. Ils sont également utilisés pour limiter le nombre de
   fois où vous voyez une annonce et pour mesurer l'efficacité des
   campagnes publicitaires. Ils mémorisent votre visite sur un site Web et
   cette information est partagée avec d'autres organisations telles que
   des annonceurs.

   Gestion des cookies

   Vous pouvez gérer les cookies des sites Web dans les paramètres de
   votre navigateur ; vous avez toujours la possibilité de modifier ces
   paramètres pour accepter, rejeter ou supprimer les cookies. Si vous
   choisissez de modifier vos paramètres, certaines fonctionnalités
   risquent de ne pas être entièrement opérationnelles, comme ce qui était
   prévu dans le cadre des Services. Les paramètres de gestion des cookies
   sont légèrement différents d'un navigateur à l'autre. Consultez les
   paramètres pertinents de votre navigateur.

   Nous pensons que vous voudrez peut-être en savoir plus sur les cookies.
   Voici quelques ressources utiles qui fournissent des informations
   détaillées sur les types de cookies, la façon dont ils sont utilisés et
   la façon dont vous pouvez gérer vos préférences en matière de cookies :
   www.aboutcookies.org et www.allaboutcookies.org. Veuillez cliquer
   ci-dessous pour obtenir des informations détaillées sur la manière de
   désactiver et de supprimer les cookies dans les navigateurs couramment
   utilisés :
     * Mozilla Firefox®
     * Microsoft® Internet Explorer
     * Google Chrome™
     * Safari®

   Nous utilisons d'autres technologies de suivi en plus des cookies :
     * Objets locaux partagés/cookies Flash : les cookies Flash, aussi
       appelés « objets locaux partagés », sont conçus pour gérer le
       contenu du navigateur pris en charge par Adobe® Flash. Ils sont
       généralement utilisés pour permettre l'affichage d'annonces
       publicitaires et de contenu vidéo sur les sites Internet. Comme
       d'autres cookies, ils stockent des informations sur votre
       périphérique, dont certaines sont propres au contenu autorisé par
       Flash. Les cookies Flash ne peuvent être supprimés que dans Adobe
       Flash et non via votre navigateur. Veuillez vous reporter à la page
       d'aide suivante pour obtenir davantage d'informations sur la
       manière de gérer vos paramètres de confidentialité et de
       suppression des cookies Flash :
       http://www.macromedia.com/support/documentation/en/flashplayer/help
       /settings_manager.html.
     * Balises Web : nos pages Internet peuvent contenir des images
       électroniques connues sous le nom de balises Web (également
       appelées fichiers GIF à un pixel et images graphiques
       transparentes) que nous utilisons pour nous aider à placer des
       cookies sur nos sites, compter les utilisateurs qui ont visité ces
       sites, offrir des Services et analyser l'efficacité de nos
       campagnes promotionnelles, entre autres. Nous pouvons aussi inclure
       des balises Web dans nos courriers électroniques de marketing ou
       dans nos newsletters pour déterminer si un courrier électronique a
       été ouvert ou si vous avez cliqué sur les liens. Les balises Web
       sont également utilisées pour vous fournir de la publicité ciblée
       par centre d'intérêt.
     * Serveur Web et journaux d'application : nos serveurs recueillent
       automatiquement certaines informations pour nous aider à
       administrer et à protéger les Services, à analyser l'utilisation et
       à améliorer l'expérience des utilisateurs. Les informations
       recueillies comprennent :
          + L'adresse IP et le type de navigateur ;
          + Les informations sur le périphérique, y compris
            l'identification unique des dispositifs (IUD), l'adresse MAC,
            l'identifiant pour les annonceurs (IFA) et les identifiants
            similaires attribués par nous ou par d'autres personnes ;
          + Le système d'exploitation de l'appareil et d'autres données
            techniques ;
          + La ville, l'état/la région et le pays à partir duquel vous
            accédez à notre site Internet ;
          + Les pages visitées et le contenu consulté, stocké et acheté ;
          + Les informations ou le texte saisi ;
          + Les liens et les boutons sur lesquels vous avez cliqué ;
          + Les URL visités avant et après votre utilisation de nos
            services.

   Signaux « Do Not Track »

   Certains navigateurs transmettent des signaux Do Not Track (DNT) à des
   sites Internet. En raison de l'absence d'une interprétation commune des
   signaux DNT à l'échelle du secteur, actuellement, nous ne modifions pas
   et ne répondons pas aux demandes ou aux signaux DNT de ces navigateurs.
   Nous continuons de surveiller l'activité du secteur dans ce domaine et
   nous reconsidérons nos pratiques en matière de DNT si nécessaire.

   Connexion via les réseaux sociaux

   Certains de nos Services peuvent inclure des fonctionnalités de réseaux
   sociaux, tels que le bouton Facebook® « J'aime » et des widgets, des
   boutons « Partager » et des mini-programmes interactifs. En outre, vous
   pouvez choisir d'utiliser vos propres identifiants de connexion de
   réseaux sociaux, par exemple Facebook ou LinkedIn®, pour vous connecter
   à certains de nos Services. Si vous choisissez de vous connecter à
   l'aide d'un réseau social ou d'un service similaire, nous pouvons
   recevoir et stocker des informations d'authentification de ce service
   pour vous permettre de vous connecter, ainsi que d'autres informations
   que vous pouvez choisir de partager lorsque vous vous connectez par
   l'intermédiaire de ces Services. Ces Services peuvent recueillir des
   informations telles que les pages Internet que vous avez consultées et
   les adresses IP. Ils peuvent aussi créer des cookies pour rendre les
   fonctionnalités parfaitement opérationnelles. Nous ne sommes pas
   responsables de la sécurité ou de la confidentialité de toute
   information recueillie par ces tiers. Vous devez consulter les
   déclarations de confidentialité ou les politiques applicables aux
   services tiers auxquels vous accédez, auxquels vous vous connectez ou
   que vous utilisez. Si vous ne souhaitez pas que vos informations
   personnelles soient partagées avec votre fournisseur de compte de
   réseaux sociaux ou d'autres utilisateurs du service de réseaux sociaux,
   veuillez ne pas lier votre compte de réseaux sociaux avec votre compte
   pour les services et ne pas participer au partage social sur les
   services.

OU TROUVER DE PLUS AMPLES INFORMATIONS SUR LA PROTECTION DES INFORMATIONS
PERSONNELLES SUR NOS PRODUITS ET NOS SERVICES ?

   La présente Déclaration se rapporte généralement aux informations
   personnelles que nous recueillons sur les utilisateurs en relation avec
   les Services, où nous prenons des décisions concernant la façon dont
   ces informations sont traitées (Thomson Reuters agit comme un
   responsable). Toutefois, vous pouvez cliquer sur « En savoir plus »
   ci-dessous pour obtenir plus d'informations sur la manière dont nous
   traitons les informations personnelles que nos clients saisissent dans
   nos Services et pour lesquelles Thomson Reuters ne prend pas de
   décisions (Thomson Reuters agit comme un sous-traitant).

   Lorsque nous avons besoin de vous donner des informations
   supplémentaires sur la façon dont vos informations personnelles sont
   utilisées par rapport à des Services spécifiques, nous vous fournirons
   des avis de confidentialité distincts ou supplémentaires.

   Votre fournisseur de services professionnel (par exemple, votre
   conseiller financier, fiscal, juridique ou comptable) et d'autres tiers
   peuvent saisir vos informations personnelles dans les Services que nous
   mettons à leur disposition et que nous hébergeons pour eux en leur nom.
   Ils peuvent vous fournir leurs propres avis de confidentialité.
   Contactez-les directement pour obtenir ces avis ou recherchez ces
   documents sur leurs sites Web.

   Utilisation de données accessibles au public dans le cadre de nos
   Services

   De nombreux professionnels et tiers s'appuient sur l'utilisation
   d'informations disponibles au public afin d'effectuer des recherches
   (par exemple, sur la jurisprudence) ou pour satisfaire à leurs
   obligations en matière de conformité (par exemple, pour mener des
   contrôles contre le blanchiment d'argent).

   Pour les aider, nous mettons à disposition des informations obtenues à
   partir de sources ouvertes au public comme des sites Web publics, des
   bases de données gouvernementales ouvertes ou d'autres données du
   domaine public (dont certaines sont payantes et d'autres non).

   Nous prenons la confidentialité très au sérieux et nous mettons en
   place des mesures visant à assurer que nous traitons les informations
   personnelles d'une façon proportionnée et en conformité avec les lois
   relatives à la protection des données.

   Lorsque nous traitons des informations personnelles non sensibles au
   sein de ces Services, celles-ci sont traitées normalement, car cela
   sert nos intérêts légitimes ou ceux d'un tiers. Dans l'éventualité où
   nous serions amenés à traiter des informations personnelles sensibles,
   nous ne le faisons généralement que si :
     * cela est nécessaire par rapport aux obligations découlant des lois
       relatives à l'emploi, à la sécurité sociale et à la protection
       sociale ;
     * les informations personnelles ont manifestement été rendues
       publiques par la personne qu'elles concernent ;
     * cela est nécessaire pour la constatation, l'exercice ou la défense
       d'une requête juridique, ou lorsque les tribunaux exercent leurs
       fonctions ;
     * le traitement est nécessaire pour des raisons d'intérêt public
       important, en vertu des lois en vigueur.

   Nous avons mis en place des mesures appropriées pour protéger vos
   informations lorsqu'elles sont transférées à l'étranger, pour les
   sécuriser et pour garantir qu'elles seront uniquement conservées
   pendant une période raisonnable.

   Si vous souhaitez demander plus d'informations sur la façon dont les
   informations personnelles sont utilisées au sein d'un Service
   spécifique, veuillez contacter notre équipe de protection de la vie
   privée.

   Pour vous fournir davantage de contexte sur d'autres produits et
   services que nous offrons, nous avons inclus ci-dessous plus
   d'informations concernant certaines pratiques en matière de protection
   des données dans nos activités Juridique et Fiscalité et comptabilité.

   Produits et services juridiques

   Notre activité juridique mondiale offre des outils de recherche et de
   gestion d'activité et des outils de productivité aux professionnels du
   secteur juridique, et traite souvent les informations personnelles
   saisies par nos utilisateurs dans les Services. Par exemple, si un
   cabinet d'avocats utilise nos Services de gestion de cabinet, ils
   peuvent consigner des informations personnelles lors de l'utilisation
   de ces Services et peuvent nous demander de les conserver ou d'y
   accéder en leur nom (par exemple, pour fournir une assistance
   Logiciel/Service).

   Les produits juridiques de dossiers publics de Thomson comprennent la
   gamme de produits CLEAR et les données des dossiers publics de Westlaw,
   y compris PeopleMap et Company Investigator. Ces produits sont
   constitués de données client et entreprise globales provenant
   d'organismes gouvernementaux et de fournisseurs de données tiers
   réputés du secteur privé. Ces produits sont uniquement disponibles pour
   les entreprises autorisées et les organismes gouvernementaux pour leurs
   utilisations professionnelles internes légitimes et sous réserve des
   lois en vigueur. En plus de la présente Déclaration, ces produits sont
   aussi assujettis à la Déclaration de confidentialité des dossiers
   publics, disponible ici :
   https://legalsolutions.thomsonreuters.com/law-products/about/legal-noti
   ces/privacy/records?CID=TRSite.

   Pour plus d'informations sur la façon dont vos professionnels du
   secteur juridique traitent vos informations personnelles, veuillez les
   contacter directement.

   Thomson Reuters reconnaît et respecte que nombre des clients et
   utilisateurs de nos Services juridiques professionnels (tels que
   Westlaw et Practical Law) peuvent être assujettis aux obligations
   éthiques afin de protéger les documents confidentiels de leurs clients.
   Lorsque nous agissons en tant que fournisseur de services en ce qui
   concerne les informations confidentielles ou personnelles que nos
   clients ou utilisateurs saisissent dans nos Services juridiques, nous
   le faisons conformément aux lois admissibles et nous n'utilisons pas
   ces informations autrement que pour fournir, administrer et améliorer
   nos Services, offrir une assistance aux utilisateurs ou pour satisfaire
   à nos obligations légales.

   Produits et services Tax & Accounting

   Notre division Tax & Accounting fournit des outils qui assistent les
   professionnels du secteur de la fiscalité et de la comptabilité. Ces
   Services traitent généralement les informations personnelles au nom de
   nos clients lorsqu'ils utilisent nos Services.  Cela peut inclure des
   informations personnelles sensibles telles que des renseignements qui
   pourraient déterminer la race, l'origine ethnique, l'orientation
   sexuelle et/ou de l'état de santé d'une personne. Par exemple, si un
   comptable utilise notre logiciel de fiscalité et comptabilité, il peut
   l'utiliser pour traiter des informations sur des individus et nous
   demander de les conserver ou d'y accéder en leur nom (par exemple, pour
   offrir une assistance Logiciel/Service).

   Si vous souhaitez en savoir plus sur les informations personnelles
   détenues par votre comptable ou votre conseiller fiscal, veuillez le
   contacter directement.

COMMENT NOUS CONTACTER ?

   Si vous avez des questions, des commentaires, des plaintes ou des
   suggestions en ce qui concerne la protection des données ou la présente
   Déclaration, ou toute autre préoccupation concernant la manière dont
   nous traitons vos informations, veuillez contacter notre équipe de
   protection de la vie privée par e-mail à privacy.enquiries@tr.com ou
   par courrier à l'adresse : Équipe de protection de la vie privée,
   Thomson Reuters, 30 South Colonnade-Canary Wharf, Londres, E14 5EP,
   Royaume-Uni.

   Si vous n'êtes pas satisfait de la réponse obtenue, nous vous
   encourageons à faire remonter votre requête à notre responsable de la
   protection des données par e-mail à dpprivacyofficer@tr.com ou par
   courrier à l'adresse : Responsable de la protection des données,
   Thomson Reuters, 30 South Colonnade-Canary Wharf, Londres, E14 5EP,
   Royaume-Uni.

   En outre, si vous souhaitez trouver un bureau de Thomson Reuters,
   veuillez consulter la page
   https://www.thomsonreuters.com/en/locations.html.

   Dépôt de plainte. Si vous n'êtes pas satisfait de la façon dont Thomson
   Reuters gère vos informations personnelles, vous pouvez déposer une
   plainte auprès d'une autorité de contrôle de la confidentialité. Dans
   l'Espace économique européen, l'autorité de contrôle compétente est
   celle du pays ou du territoire dans lequel :
     * vous résidez ;
     * vous travaillez ; ou
     * la violation alléguée a eu lieu.

   Une liste des autorités nationales chargées de la protection des
   données dans l'Espace économique européen est disponible ici :
   http://ec.europa.eu/justice/data-protection/bodies/authorities/index_en
   .htm.

MISES À JOUR DE CETTE DÉCLARATION

   La présente Déclaration peut être mise à jour. Tout ajout ou
   modification matériel futur relatif au traitement des informations
   personnelles tel que décrit dans les présentes et vous concernant vous
   sera communiqué par le biais des canaux appropriés. Par exemple, nous
   pouvons placer un avis bien en vue sur le site d'un produit ou dans un
   e-mail pour vous avertir de la mise à jour de la Déclaration.
   Thomson Reuters
   (BUTTON)

   IFRAME: https://www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-KGLP7Z9
     * Directory Global directory

     * Logins Product logins
     * Support Support & training
     * Contact Contact us

   Close (BUTTON)

Our Privacy Statement & Cookie Policy

   All Thomson Reuters websites use cookies to improve your online
   experience. They were placed on your computer when you launched this
   website. You can change your cookie settings through your browser.
     * Privacy Statement
     * Cookie Policy

   (BUTTON) Ok to continue
   Thomson Reuters
   (BUTTON) (BUTTON)
     * Solutions
       (BUTTON)
       Solutions

Industries
          + Legal Leverage unparalleled legal content, expertise, and
            technology
          + News & media Find essential resources for broadcasters and
            publishers
          + Tax & accounting Explore our tax and accounting technology,
            guidance, and expertise

Organizations
          + Corporations Let us help you solve your toughest business
            challenges
          + Government Government professionals trust us to help them make
            informed decisions
          + Professional services firms Access global tax, legal, and risk
            management resources for today’s professional services firms
     * Insights
       (BUTTON)
       Insights

Topics
          + Artificial intelligence
          + Big data
          + Blockchain
          + Brexit
          + Data privacy & GDPR
          + Global trade
          + Regulatory intelligence
          + See all articles

Reports
          + AI predictions
          + Are you ready for blockchain?
          + Ending modern slavery
          + Will electric vehicles really create a cleaner planet?
          + See all reports
     * About us
       (BUTTON)
       About us

Our company
          + Overview
          + Company history
          + Awards & recognition
          + Events
          + Partners
          + Office locations

Media
          + Investor relations
          + Media contacts
          + Press releases

Leadership
          + Board of directors
          + Executive team

Our values
          + Social impact
          + Thomson Reuters Foundation
          + Trust Principles
     * Careers
       (BUTTON)
       Careers

Thomson Reuters Careers
          + Careers overview
          + Connect with us
          + FAQs
          + Sign up for job alerts
          + Careers blog

Who we are
          + Working at Thomson Reuters
          + Our people
          + Our story app

Where we are
          + Our office locations

Our jobs
          + Experienced professionals
          + Sales
          + Technology
          + Temporary jobs in the US
          + Temporary jobs in the UK
          + See all jobs

Graduates & interns
          + Recent graduates
          + Internships

   Legal research

Introducing Westlaw Edge Quick Check

   An intelligent legal document analysis tool to ensure you are citing
   the most relevant authority and nothing is missed.
   Learn more

Learn about our products

   Explore all products

   NEWS & MEDIA

Reuters Connect

   A faster, more intelligent way of sourcing the news content you need
   through a single destination.

   See details

   LEGAL

Westlaw Edge

   Use the most intelligent legal research service ever to get the fastest
   answers and most valuable insights.

   See details

   TAX & ACCOUNTING

ONESOURCE

   Tax technology that helps businesses stay compliant, avoid penalties
   and audits, and save time.

   See details

   TAX & ACCOUNTING

Checkpoint

   Innovative online research suite of editorial and source materials,
   productivity tools, learning, and news.

   See details

   Legal

CLEAR

   Locate and connect complex pieces of data in a single dashboard to
   identify critical connections.

   See details

   TAX & ACCOUNTING

Onvio

   Cloud-based software that gives you real-time access to projects,
   workloads, documents, billing, and more.

   See details
     * Latest News
     * Britain's Johnson faces cabinet revolt over no-deal Brexit: media
       days ago
     * Hong Kong pro-democracy activist appeals against sentence as
       further protests loom days ago
     * Exclusive: Democrats willing to risk 2020 chances to impeach Trump
       - Reuters/Ipsos poll days ago
     * Chinese state media slam U.S. basketball's NBA in free speech row
       days ago
     * California wildfire risk prompts planned mass cutoff of PG&E power
       days ago
     * Asian stocks swoon on signs of prolonged U.S.-China standoff days
       ago
     * Turkish and Syrian rebel forces to start Syria offensive 'shortly':
       Erdogan's aide days ago
     * China's ANTA sports says it will immediately halt contract renewal
       negotiations NBA days ago
     * U.S. expands blacklist to include China's top AI startups ahead of
       trade talks days ago
     * Goldman evaluating role in China's Megvii IPO after U.S. blacklist
       days ago
     * UAW union pushes GM to boost U.S. auto production days ago
     * Protests resume in Iraq's Sadr City as uprising enters second week
       days ago
     * Explainer: Barr investigates the investigators of Russian meddling
       days ago
     * Jury says J&J must pay $8 billion in case over male breast growth
       linked to Risperdal days ago
     * Wealthy couple gets prison terms for U.S. college admissions scam
       days ago
     * U.S. imposes visa restrictions on Chinese officials over Muslim
       treatment days ago
     * China condemns U.S. visa restrictions over treatment of Muslims
       days ago
     * Boeing 737 MAX timetable uncertain as regulators continue safety
       review days ago
     * Jeffrey Epstein accuser expands lawsuit against estate, alleged
       enablers days ago
     * For LGBT people outside U.S. Supreme Court, cases have a familiar
       ring days ago

   (BUTTON)

Recent insights

     * All
     * Corporations
     * Government
     * Legal
     * News & media
     * Professional services firms
     * Tax & accounting

   ANTI-CORRUPTION

Corruption Report 2019: Non-Financial Companies Need to Be Ready as
Regulators Focus In

   October 04, 2019
   5 min

   Expert insight

     As we mark the milestone of bringing half the world online, we must
     redouble our efforts to ensure access for the remaining 50%.
     Stewardship of a global, inclusive society is everyone’s
     responsibility.

   Jim Smith
   President and CEO
   hand-holding-eye-glasses-laptop-glass-top-desk

   TAX AND ACCOUNTING

10 steps for creating a corporate tax technology roadmap

   September 26, 2019
   6 min

   Reuters Newsmaker interviews

Philip Lane, Chief Economist of the ECB, speaks on inflation & the risk of
recession

   October 01, 2019 •﻿﻿Helen Chan, Regulatory Intelligence and eLearning
   Expert
   5 min

   THOMSON REUTERS GOVERNMENT DAY

Digging through the skepticism to find the real value of blockchain

   September 19, 2019 •Joseph Raczynski, Manager, Technical Client
   Management
   5 min

   COMPANY CULTURE

Peer, public pressure compels firms to get serious about after-hours
misconduct

   September 03, 2019 •﻿﻿Helen Chan, Regulatory Intelligence and eLearning
   Expert
   6 min

   Customer insight

     It’s great to work with Thomson Reuters. Thomson Reuters is really a
     remarkable company that provides a lot of value to Cisco every day.

   Mark Chandler
   General Counsel, Cisco

   TAX AND ACCOUNTING

Beyond regulatory compliance: 5 questions that tax analytics can help
companies answer

   September 05, 2019 •David Curle, Director, Technology and Innovation
   Platform
   6 min

   REGULATORY INTELLIGENCE

FCA investigating up to 4 whistleblowing champions for senior manager
failings

   August 29, 2019
   6 min

   Corporate strategy and development

Corporate tax departments are spending more on technology to keep pace with
internal and external demands

   August 27, 2019
   5 min

   Special Report

Cost of Compliance Survey 2019: Nothing is certain except regulatory change

   June 27, 2019 •Susannah Hammond, Senior Regulatory Intelligence Expert
   6 min

   GDPR

Data privacy and GDPR at one year: a U.S. perspective

   May 30, 2019 •Todd Ehret, Senior Regulatory Intelligence Expert
   5 min

   ANTI-MONEY LAUNDERING

Reform in U.S. anti-money laundering rules grows more likely, but could take
time

   May 23, 2019 •Brett Wolf
   5 min

   REGULATORY INTELLIGENCE

Determining beneficial ownership and closing the gaps in sanctions lists

   May 21, 2019
   5 min

   LEGAL EXECUTIVE INSTITUTE

Articles, whitepapers, and resources on combating government fraud

   Learn more

   CASE STUDY: Social Security/Bank Fraud

How a bank investigator used Thomson Reuters CLEAR to solve a case of double
identity

   Learn more

   Customer insight

     Practical Law Connect has helped me and my legal team perform at a
     higher level by offering resources specifically tailored to in-house
     counsel on a platform that is easy to use.

   ARTICLE

Due diligence business investigations checklist – are you on track?

   5 min
   Unlock the secrets to effective case strategy

   white paper

Unlock the secrets to effective case strategy

   Learn more
   Lawrence Hsieh, Thomson Reuters

   Expert insight

Meet our Practical Law attorney editors

   Learn more

   Trust

Why press freedom should be at the top of everyone’s agenda

   •Stephen J. Adler President and Editor-in-Chief, Reuters

   Community

Join Reuters Community – the inspiring network that facilitates
transformation

   Learn more

   News

You need hard facts to change newsrooms

   Dietmar Schantin

   digital identity

What can 720,000 news headlines tell us about the future of our digital
world?

   Daniella Tsar

   Entertainment

Reuters Entertainment News: We've got you covered

   Learn more

   COMPANY CULTURE

Peer, public pressure compels firms to get serious about after-hours
misconduct

   September 03, 2019 •﻿﻿Helen Chan, Regulatory Intelligence and eLearning
   Expert
   6 min

   Customer insight

     It’s great to work with Thomson Reuters. Thomson Reuters is really a
     remarkable company that provides a lot of value to Cisco every day.

   Mark Chandler
   General Counsel, Cisco

   TAX AND ACCOUNTING

Beyond regulatory compliance: 5 questions that tax analytics can help
companies answer

   September 05, 2019 •David Curle, Director, Technology and Innovation
   Platform
   6 min

   REGULATORY INTELLIGENCE

FCA investigating up to 4 whistleblowing champions for senior manager
failings

   August 29, 2019
   6 min

   Corporate strategy and development

Corporate tax departments are spending more on technology to keep pace with
internal and external demands

   August 27, 2019
   5 min
   fta-thumbnail

   TECHNOLOGY

10 steps for creating a corporate tax technology roadmap

   Expert insight

     To become trusted advisors to their clients, accounting firms must
     embrace technology to automate their compliance and workflow tasks
     and make room for higher-value service.

   Charlotte Rushton
   President, Tax Professionals

   REGULATORY INTELLIGENCE

Cost of Compliance Survey 2019: Nothing is certain except regulatory change

   Susannah Hammond, Senior Regulatory Intelligence Expert

   TCJA TOOLKIT

Get all the TCJA tools you need to educate clients and prepare for the future

   Industry trends

Insightful analysis of the trends that could impact your business

Latest press releases

   View all press releases

   Thomson Reuters Corporate

Thomson Reuters announces new time for third-quarter 2019 earnings results
webcast

   Webcast to begin at 9:00 A.M. EDT
   October 08, 2019

   Thomson Reuters Corporate

Thomson Reuters acquires FC Business Intelligence

   FCBI delivers high-end conferences and exhibitions to diverse sectors
   including energy, insurance, pharmaceuticals, transportation, travel,
   strategy, and technology.
   October 04, 2019

   Thomson Reuters Corporate

Thomson Reuters announces global RegTech competition

   Designed to provide early stage start-ups in the legal, tax, and
   regulatory space the opportunity to partner with one of the industry’s
   leading providers of business information services.
   September 26, 2019

Need help?

   We want our products to provide you optimum efficiency. Find technical
   support, product updates, training sessions, and more.
   Support & training

Get in touch

   For any questions regarding our solutions and services, our customer
   service representatives are here to help.
   Contact us

Access your product

   Already a customer? Log in to access your account and recent work.
   Product logins
   Built on trust

   At a time when the virtues of objectivity, accuracy, fairness, and
   transparency are under attack, we consider it our duty to pursue them —
   just as we have for more than 100 years.
   Explore the Trust Principles
   Search
   ____________________
   (BUTTON)
   (BUTTON)

     * (BUTTON) About Thomson Reuters
          + About us
          + Annual report
          + Careers
          + Events
          + Investor relations
          + Press releases
          + Site map
     * (BUTTON) Products & Services
          + All products
          + Corporations
          + Government
          + Legal
          + News & media
          + Professional services firms
          + Tax & accounting
     * (BUTTON) Learn More
          + Innovation @ Thomson Reuters
          + Insights from Answers On
          + Partnerships
          + Social impact
          + Supplier portal
     * (BUTTON) Contacts
          + Contact us
          + Global sites directory
          + Investors
          + Media relations
          + Office locations
          + Sales & account inquiries
     * (BUTTON) Connect With Us
          + Facebook
          + Instagram
          + LinkedIn
          + Twitter
          + YouTube

   Thomson Reuters
   (BUTTON)
     * Cookie policy
     * Terms of use
     * Privacy statement
     * Copyright
     * Careers
     * Supply chain transparency

   IFRAME: https://www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-KGLP7Z9
